Currently trending now, are the classic and chic glass coffee table. I have been eyeing them for some time now. They are beautiful, simple, elegant and (if you have children) kinda scary. I have been toying with the idea of getting one. But my fear of these tables always creeps to the forefront of my mind because of the little rascals, who run around and live at my house. I then proceed to talk myself out of having one because they just don't seem realistic. Now...take into consideration, my children are 5 and almost 4 and I can't have any more children. I don't run a daycare or have play dates at my home. And, I do display fragile pieces in my home....hmm,
Embryo at six weeks.
I know that many of you have the cookbook in your personal libraries and the companion book is very thought-provoking. From the book jacket:
Sergeant Miles rolled his eyes as the young Property Manager, Estate Agent, Development Company bum-boy, or whatever you want to call the parasites puked on the factory floor. Evidently it wasn’t the first time. Spatters of it ran across the concrete, some of it had been skidded in.
But what a lovely day it was. The sun was shining, (although there was doubt of that as it stormed all day yesterday) and the location divine. However, in my rush to get Miss Four out to her ballet concert before I headed off, I forgot the camera! That is just not like me. This ballet business has been much more involved, long winded and demanding than I expected for a Four year old's class. However, I have much to say on that so I'll save it for another day. For today's picnic I even had a date. The Mr. came along and little Miss One too. So we feasted on sandwiches and pretzels,bundt cake and petite fours, and a gin and tonic or two. What a way to spend a Saturday. I hope your's is just as sunny, even if only metaphorically.
22. Mary Jane's Last Dance
So I'm just doing my duty, and bringing you another Sweets on Sunday post. ha ha. These are not anything special or fancy- but you know that moment on Sunday evening, when you want to make a sweet treat, and you don't know what to make? These work well for that. If you are like me, you just have one or two, and then make sure your kids or husband or neighbors eat the rest of them. I did lighten mine up a bit, but still. These little guys are pretty tasty and rich!
I'm not sure what color I will go with, but I will be using this book for inspiration.
Islam manages to derail the West, both Europe and later North America. This disrupts global trade, and the ripples create chaos in other parts of the world, including East Asia. India will be drawn directly into the conflict with Islam, as will Russia and Israel.
Her fresh eyes and perspective on CHA are sure to breath new life into this blog/group/community and bring CHA back to the thriving centre for Aussie crafters that it has been in the past.
Off south again on 21st March. Arguably a silly date to be flying to the southern hemisphere but never mind. Post-breeding dispersal of seabirds actually makes autumn an interesting time to down there. Route is Falklands, South Orkneys, NW Weddell Sea (just before the ice gets there, hopefully), South Georgia (with base calls), Falklands and then holiday time on Ascension Island on way back. Getting back early May.
Although there's nothing he can do.
ANZA Club – 3 W. 8th Ave
Aren’t they lovely and that color is definitely my color. The bigger dish is 9” square and the smaller on is 5” square. Sigh Le Creuset
I'm so thankful for him; so thankful that he talked me into getting out of the car and walking into that building so that God could begin tightening us back together. We were falling apart in some ways and didn't even know it. And we still have a lot of work to do, but I do believe that Sunday June 5th was an important night in our marriage. I love Josh and I couldn't imagine life without him. And I know that God is working in his life in ways that are unknown to me and that's ok. I'm not supposed to be in control. I'm not supposed to be the leader.
The Big Empty (2005)
One firm was implicated in a bid-fraud scheme at a Brooklyn hospital, and two were cited in bribery investigations. That’s in addition to Breeze National, the mob-linked demolition company handling the jobs in which two workers have been killed.
Next Issue - Well, there ain't no next issue, but we start off with issue number one of HEX (which is how it should be read, at the top of your lungs.)
But you would be wrong. The eurocrats in Brussels have much bigger fish to fry. They’re addressing the unmitigated horror of inadequate female representation in corporate boardrooms and contemplating continent-wide quotas.
3 walk
Learning this lesson was hard, sometimes painful, but worth it. We are stronger in our marriage because of it. We earned every bit of our two years and look forward to earning many, many more. We refuse to let trivial, small things get in the way of our happiness. We will do whatever it takes to avoid taking the easy way out. It's worth it.
Jeez I had this photo taken and post written this morning and the day got away from me.
The need to have Blacks and Whites to talk about racism with each other.
Tyerman, in his "Life of Wesley," tells us the great trouble the famous preacher had with his early converts.
I also need to mention Katelyn. My little sister who was willing to fly all the way to the Midwest the day after Thanksgiving leaving both her job and her husband (on their anniversary!) to watch all 5 of my babies for a very long time. We couldn't have done it without her! Knowing they were in capable hands put my mind completely at ease as we boarded the plane early Saturday Morning. November 26th.
If you like this mature oak-aged style you'd be better off going for a Spanish red like Valdepenas or even a Rioja if you find one at a good price. And Sainsbury's has better bargains than this in its 'House' range - the Chianti (£4.29) for a start.
BMI 16.7 68%
Speaking of which, thanks for letting me know the plans. It sounds great. I just want to do whatever you want to do. Im excited to see everyone! Ive worked really hard to hold back the excitement so that I could focus on my last few weeks here. And Im happy to say Ive done pretty well. We are working hard and I feel great serving the Lord. But I cant help being excited to go home anymore. Im excited to spend time with everyone - especially Asher! It should be a great summer.
Death is an excellent equaliser.
But then as I got up to leave from the culvert, there were these two girls fetching water. Or were they carrying school bags? I forget. One must’ve been about 14 and the other 8. They didn’t come close but asked questions from afar, smiling broadly at my responses. And when I finally got on the bike to leave they blew me flying kisses. I was smiling for the next few kilometers.
In case you have been wondering at my lack of posting, this week is finals week.
Moorman WJ, Shaw PB, Turner TW, Schrader SM. Sperm Count vs Blood Lead General Linear Model: Multiple Studies from Worksite Exposures. J Andrology 2002; (Suppl.): 40.
Helen Moran, the Chair of the Brain Injury Awareness Campaign, will be out and about during the week, raising awareness and raising funds for the campaign, and she will be doing the whole thing in her pyjamas. Why pyjamas? Mindwaves hopes to catch up with her for an interview during the week, possibly at the fashion show she is modelling at. Pyjamas and a cycle crash helmet, apparently – we can hardly wait!
"Poker is like sex - everyone thinks they're the best, but the truth is y'all have a small penis." -Me
Shirzad rightly points out the inner judge is the ring leader of self-defeating attitudes and behaviors. Frankly, at one time or another, all ten have been guests in my head. How about you?
Slap a Bolland cover on that and we are talking perfection folks (Why couldn't they have done THIS issue for the Jonah Hex movie? WHHHHHHYYYYYYYYY?!?!?!?!?!?!?) This issue is worth easily triple the $2.99 cover price.
After all the games are finished for the second round, there were eight upsets on Friday, including two #15 seeds beating #2 seeds. North Carolina State, who finished 22-12 and fifth place in the ACC, trumped #6 San Diego State 79-65. The game was close at halftime, with the Wolfpack leading by four points, but NC State took over in the second half, led by Richard Howell’s twenty-two points.
Apparently though, this is when we are supposed to start setting boundaries. Fixed and sturdy ones that do not bend under the will of a toddler. This gives them security, so the experts say. It gives mum and dad a headache too, since we don't seem to have the temperament for calm consistency. I do have some hard and fast rules. For example I will only let my son leave his pajamas on all weekend if they are not soaked in urine. And I don't let him wear his pajamas out of the house either. At least not yet. I was inspired to do so in the future by a family we ran into at a museum this week. The kids, about the same age as mine, were all in their (admittedly very stylish) PJ's. I complimented them on their ingenuity, and their very nice mum, a fellow Brit in fact, shrugged and smiled.
Note: This is a replica, not the real thing.
From as early as I can remember, I have always been fascinated with it. Celebrities and their drama-filled hashtag worthy personal lives, music and movies seem to be my niche. To explore my passion, I have served as lifestyles editor for Florida A&M’s campus publication, “The Famuan,” and I currently represent Florida A&M as a style contributor for CollegeFashionista.com.
TCL In your bio you mention celebrity influences (such as André 3000, Kanye West, and Pharrell Williams) and then you also mentioned your dad. In what ways has your father (Taji Nahl of House of Ra’oof) inspired you to do what you do?
"Have no fear, young men. The light is quite harmless as long as you do not get the crystal light on you. Note -- it is not white; it is simply a rod of cold, crystal-colored light. You are conscious of its extreme intensity. Some of its intensity is converted into radiant energy as it strikes the quartz plate, the only thing I have found that is not affected by the Z-ray. It alone I have found will disintegrate the ray -- how, I do not know."
We have had a dry September this year. This poem is from the book and I thought a few of you lovelies might be interested in this as I think we all know the first line :0)
HT: I would recommend Vampire Love Story or Werewolf Love Story to start with. Vampire Love story is told through Josiah Reign's eyes and it will give the reader a foundation of all the characters and where they are going. I would also recommend for a reader to start with Werewolf Love story if they wish because the story takes place five years earlier. The book is through Josiah's best friend Tommy's eyes.
it all started with this plea:
Little leaves fall softly down
Boyshort: $42
I was standing wondering at the tavern being all boarded up when I found the vampire, Keriandal, standing behind me. I was not worried at first, for he has told me before that he has reason to care for humans, and besides I saw him looking after Yoko when she was wounded. But he was nervous and angry about the tavern being closed. He forced his way in through the window and found there was no spirit left, and told me drinking whisky is the only way he can make himself drink animal blood instead of human. So I ran to the lighthouse to see if there was any strong drink there, but there was only a jug of rum, and I do not know how old it was. I persuaded him to go to see, thinking to run home while he was gone, but then found the guard, Delice. She confronted him when he came back and he settled down a bit, but ye should be warned, he may have become unpredictable. So if anyone has any strong drink in their homes, it may be good to offer some to the vampire, until the tavern is up and running again, or else stay home and take precautions against vampires.
Diarrhoeal diseases caused by poor sanitation and unsafe water kill more children than AIDS, malaria and measles combined. In Africa, diarrhoea is now the biggest killer of children under five. Some 2.6 billion people across the globe live with no access to a safe clean toilet.
majestic birds have brought to my life----Big Boy,
4. Revlon Nail Polish – Crème Brûlée
We’ve become accustomed to a new way of being “alone together.” Technology-enabled, we are able to be with one another, and also elsewhere, connected to wherever we want to be. We want to customize our lives. We want to move in and out of where we are because the thing we value most is control over where we focus our attention. We have gotten used to the idea of being in a tribe of one, loyal to our own party.
It is currently unknown whether or not the device being manufactured is an actual finishedproduct or if it is just a development prototype gig, but if it is true, then it should definitely bring some excitement to hardcore gamers who have been waiting patiently for something a bit more powerful to come to market. As is usually the case with this kind of thing, the internet has been awash with speculation about the Xbox 720, but if the manufacturing rumors are true, then it’s possible the E3 conference could see some kind of announcement or unveiling.
Children are the ones in every nation upon whom hope for the future lies, and they are the youth of tomorrow upon whose shoulders the call to Islam is carried. Islam has indeed elevated the status of children and has laid down manners for their treatment relating to all their affairs and each stage of their lives, and from these are the manners for welcoming their arrival in this life.
This painting sat unresolved in my studio for many months. I just didn't know how to finish it. I finally decided to approach it the same way I did my recent bird paintings. See the April, 24 2011 post to see it "before".
I’ve been slowly realizing that, lately, I’ve really only focused on the ‘filling up’ side of things. My life has been incredibly blessed the past few months. More blessings, gifts, affirmations, and moments of truth and clarity than I can explain. That’s great, but God doesn’t bless me so that I can simply be happy. What does happy do? What does happiness bring? God blesses me so that He will be glorified through it.
And in 1955, in an old orange grove in Anaheim California, Walt opened Disneyland. And nothing was ever the same.
allowing a huge range of wood tones to shine amongst rich maroon and botanical bits.
“Nonsense,” the raven assured me, “you could eat a dozen more and still be lovely.”
In any or all of these instances and many others that you may encounter that instinctively you know are love in action, you are manifesting your love for and of God.
So, tomorrow, I start a regular twice a week small group (2-3 of us) training group at 6AM... we will be doing TRX, boot camp style training, and weights, mixing it up, but still getting the weight training and cardio that I need... and by paying for 10 weeks in advance, I'm assuring that I will get my butt out of bed because my trainer and fellow "pain-mates" will be waiting for me. Add to that a swim mate at 6AM on Wednesday or Thursdays and long runs and rides on Saturday and Sunday and I have my 5 workouts... and, hopefully, enough training to keep my weight in check and me prepared for the San Diego International in June and the Cool Breeze Century in August!
-You are a destroyer (you can mess up any given room/space in record time)
massaged into it to mask the flavor. Its own beefy flavor is sublime. Does
Single White Female – Another one I have seen, the character ‘Hedy’ (Ellen) has been cited as an example of borderline personality disorder in ‘Robinson DJ. Reel Psychiatry:Movie Portrayals of Psychiatric Conditions. Port Huron, Michigan: Rapid Psychler Press. p. 235. ISBN 1-894328-07-8.’ . She suffers from a markedly disturbed sense of identity, and tries to remedy it by adopting wholesale the attributes of her roommate. It is implied that she feels a deep-seated emptiness, while her fear of abandonment leads to drastic measures. But, yet again the character goes above and beyond what is classified as a BPD diagnosis to the point of being so violent, manipulative and ultimately murderous, not good.
Anyway, the fact that we got some "decent" pictures with our phones tells you how incredibly beautiful Yosemite was.
Any video requests? Leave them in the comments of this post!
This leaves you with a smooth, acid-free coffee base that we all love for a refreshing cold drink.
Mix the liquid ingredients until smooth, then stir in the flour mixture just until moistened. Fill muffin tins (lined with muffins liners) 3/4 full with the batter. In a small bowl, combine 2 TBSP sugar with 2 tsp cinnamon and sprinkle over the batter.
Once in Cambodia, the first amazing opportunity we had was to teach in a local school. This school, Logos International, is a private school that started out as a school for a few orphan children and has now branched out into two sister schools. Here, we were able to teach English as well as various subjects at summer school. The children (as well as us teachers!) had a lot of fun learning and connecting God’s Word to every aspect of the summer school curriculum!
I get back in bed.
621610 Home health care services
A personal highlight I had during the debate last night showed that Obama is always so serious, and showed that the charismatic campaigner from 2008 is still there. He was making reference to outdated regulations, citing a particular regulation that considered milk to be oil, and therefore taxed dairy farmers up to $10,000 a year for containment. He goes on to say that with that regulation, it’s ‘worth crying over spilt milk’. He got crickets in the chamber, but the cheesy joke showed a different side of Obama than we’ve seen during his administration – the serious, somber, cerebral administrator.
Zhara really liked the spinning chairs.
Dragon Lady: Okay, you sit right here.
I'm way behind in my CD shopping and so haven't had a chance to listen to Pop Sounds just yet, but while I did very much enjoy their old sound what little I've heard of the new one sounds prefectly agreeable too. Check out the music video for the new version of Lucky G below:
- Do not block your breathing: expire gently through your mouth during the effort, when you flex the torso, and exhale during the downswing.
“That’s what I said.”
with another….bein adam l’chaveiro are there some people you can barely stand to listen to? some you regularly brush off? resolve today the change that relationship and tolerate, even with painstaking-labor your interactions until such time as you see what it is they bring in G’d's world. it will be something you never imagined.
Pure thankfulness when I remember that I have been blessed with you when I don't deserve any child, especially you.
For me, I like 'Beef Stew' especially when there is a lot of potatoes. Only this time my dish looked pale because I ran out of carrot and capsicums. If I'd added these two, then the dish would have some color :)
Q:�Where should 60-plus year olds look for eye glasses?
Taking our call to engage the culture and prepare for it are not enough. We must actually do it. Morrow has given himself a tall order with this third section of the book as he succinctly presents and addresses a number of issues within the culture in which Christians have an answer and need to give it.These issues range from issues surrounding the Bible itself, sex, the media, global justice, politics and science and faith.
If they cannot even find technical staff to man the current subs or frigates (they call them corvettes, I doubt if the even know the difference) then where are they going to find the crew for the new Helicopter carriers??
- Oak Hill, CA
Only .99 for the Kindle
Thomas Ligotti is one of the foremost authors of supernatural horror literature. In this genre, he has been classed with Edgar Allan Poe and H. P. Lovecraft. His works include Songs of a Dead Dreamer, Grimscribe, My Work Is Not Yet Done, and Teatro Grottesco. Ligotti lives in Florida.
An outer reading of the Gnostic cosmology, on the other hand, might consider the Demiurge to be anyone’s flawed and limited image of God, which must be seen through and surpassed on the way to true spiritual insight. The Archons would be the many social laws, institutions, and corporate entities that hamstring one’s existence. On this level, a kind of external gnosis would be one’s realisation of the ultimate inability of these earthly captors to imprison our higher self. In this reading, Christ’s crucifixion and resurrection serve as metaphors for our own daily immolation and extrication. In this instance, a Gnostic motto might be: “Don’t let the bastards get you down!”
I’m driving my taxi
Hands still tightly gripped, so Creme could drag her mother around at her will (or more likely, her mother would not lose her daughter in the crowds) they wandered. Vendors were selling various food; cheeses, fruits, pickles, hot sausages, cold sausages, meat pies, pastries. It was a great festival today, and there was much cause for it; the unveiling of the Keep, the last building to be completed in Stormwind was that day, calling the city officially rebuilt. And for the workers, it would be the long awaited day that they would receive their pay.
I feel so much pride knowing you’re mine…telling all who care to know how much I gave up just to have you with me…
The Nile Basin is at a key juncture in its history. There is a major need to maintain the integrity of the river system itself in the face of rapidly rising demand, while at the same time demonstrate how the river can be utilized more productively and equitably. If the NBI is to work it also needs to be able to demonstrate early success. This will also help in the spill-over effect on a range of development issues, including increasing the social and economic stability that is essential to helping to achieve political stability in conflict-prone regions.
- Twice-As-Nice Chocolate DrizzleCorn
2 c. brown sugar
p.s. I didn't cry. Or save the hair.
Sobe Foundation - Light Neutral (applied under brow with MAC 217 by patting/sweeping)
Make with the clicking!
I still can’t believe this is the same room!
Zombies. They’re the monsters of the day, it seems. You can’t stroll down the street without some shambling horde following after you demanding ‘brains, brains, BRAINS!’. Why zombies? Why now? What does it all mean? Is it some zeitgeist statement of the world we live in, one of mindless desire, of purposeless hunger, of the infection that spreads the inanities of modern, meaningless existence, the realisation we are just shuffling along this mortal coil driven by no higher purpose than the need to feed?
Waist: 34″ I lost another half-inch! Yea! I thought I was seeing a difference but it’s nice to know that I’m not imagining it. :)
I disagree with Rapp on only one issue: her use of the word "choice" to describe what she later, in her last paragraph, terms a "decision." "Choice" implies an American fantasy of free will that virtually no one in this country actually has--it describes the fantasy that happy endings exist and may simply be selected from among other options.
Date: 2006-07-30, 3:47PM
My favorite tweak to the house has been the addition of window boxes along the front windows. I love, love, love window boxes and I really felt like this house was calling for them.
May all the souls of the untimely dead find immediate rest and peace, and may all who wish for love find it with bliss and blessings, by chthonic Hermes Psychopompos, and by Anubis, and by the god and the hero and the daimon Antinous!
Carp
But then I look at France. And I'm wondering if this intolerance is really limited to Britain. And I think it isn't.
To celebrate Roberts' longevity the distillery created a special 11 bottle set of a 1955 single malt Scotch, marking each decade of her life. The company is auctioning off the whisky at special fundraisers and breaking records along the way. They have become the most expensive bottles ever sold at auction, according to Glenfiddich.
No, thank you. Settling down is the last thing Jackson wants or needs. In fact, whenever a woman gets too attached to him, he moves on. He grabs a chair next to Mitch, turns it around and sits with his arms folded over the seatback.
So where is that promised IP question? Well, some parts of the OPCs obviously do not have to published. In particular those which contain trade secrets or could endanger intellectual property (unless there is a consent of the proprietor). I can clearly see that lots of provisions will be omitted from publication because of IP rights. However, as you may expect, in the most cases it will be done so not because of some deep respect of IP rights, but to avoid transparency and circumvent the provisions in question (invoking copyright laws for instance?). IP rights v. transparency of the government could possibly be another challenging question in the future.
Ask the students, what is a consumer? Depending on what is offered, complete explaining that a consumer is an animal that eats other organisms which can be other animals or plants. Emphasize the idea that a consumer need to look for their food and relay on other organisms to obtain food.
We've certainly come a very long way since this case, thank goodness! Sad that this case was part of the advancement in crime investigation. Pretty primitive times back then compared to today, but some lessons were always learned the hard way!
I am a Midtown Atlanta resident. I am married and have lived in the Metro-Atlanta area since 1997. After living in suburbia - Alpharetta – for four years and a few months, we decided to sell the house and move to Midtown. We have lived in Midtown in a high-rise condominium since March of 2003. We enjoy cooking, theatre, museums, travel, visiting with friends, volunteering for various organizations/causes and good wine. Since moving to Midtown, I served as the on-site Community Association Manager for Metropolis Condominium Association and currently as the Community Association Manager for Colony House Condominium Association. During my down time one might find me reading a book, listening to various genres of music, editing photos on the Mac, playing video games or sitting on our balcony enjoying the view of Piedmont Park, Midtown and Downtown Atlanta. I am a member of the Midtown Neighbor’s Association (MNA), participated on the MNA Land Use Committee, Midtown Alliance Residential Council and attend various other civic/community organization meetings/events of interest. I also organized a group of 20 Midtown residential property managers who meet on a regular basis to socialize, network and share best practices/ideas related to living in-town and in multi-unit residential communities. I received the PCAM® designation, the highest designation available from Community Association Institute (CAI) which requires strict adherence to the CAI Code of Ethics and annual continuing education requirements. I hold a Community Association Manager License from the Georgia Real Estate Commission and have also earned the Association Management Specialist (AMS®) designation from CAI. I am also designated as a Certified Manager of Community Associations (CMCA®) by the National Board of Certification for Community Association Managers. I currently serve on the CAI-GA Chapter Program Committee and Legislative Action Committee. I was previously involved in the hospitality industry as General Manager and eventually as a Director of Operation for a portfolio of hotels. As General Manager, I received many company and brand awards, most notably one of my properties received the Connie Award. This award, presented by Hilton Hotels, recognizes only the top 5% of Hilton branded hotels worldwide for customer satisfaction and successful achievement of brand initiatives.
The personal details in the letter also create suspicion with some. Reicke writes that since there are no details in the personal allusions that only Peter would have known, the personal facts (i.e. the transfiguration) are attempts to impersonate Peter.[18] Cranfield likewise suggests that the references to his approaching prophesied death, the transfiguration, his first epistle and his personal affinity for Paul “suggest a pseudonymous writer over-anxious to give his work verisimilitude.”[19]
I am a writer. I haven’t come to you asking for proof. As a girl of only sixteen years of age I can’t truly tell you if that’s what I’ll be in ten years. All I can say is that getting there will be a long, and yes, expensive road.
Calm down. Get the pills later. Two days is not a long time, she will understand.
RUSSELL TOVEY, star of the 2007 Christmas Special, Voyage of Damned, on Kylie, internet forums... and being the next Doctor!
I need to sort out what is working and what isn’t. What makes my heart sing and what is making it feel like a lead weight. I’ve got to figure out how to lighten my emotional load, how to turn those things around that I can so that I don’t feel like I am about to collapse.
He will need a lot more money
The gap between the average pay rise - a measly 1.9 per cent - and inflation - a massive 5.3 per cent - has never been bigger, according to the ONS.
As well as offering poets the chance to win considerable cash prizes and publication of their poems, the competition will raise money for conservation and poetry. We are working in partnership with leading independent UK poetry magazine, The Rialto, as we feel the magazine will be the perfect place to showcase the winning entries.
The closest you can come to moving closer to that goal of being a writer is to read and learn. There is no magic handshake. I attended conferences and at every possible turn, I went to hear speakers at local libraries and community centers. I learned volumes.
Posted as a guest blog on mothering.com 5/4/12
Walk on… and least we forget, on today of all days, justice for the 96.
Dare I hope that Peg Leg has a mate? We watch the foursome continue along the ridgeline. The two cranes on the right pause and stretch their necks to the sky. Once again the larger crane bugles straight up, the smaller joins in with her rapid rattle. This time the female has only one foot. My heart sings with Peg Leg and her mate.
Q: You teach writing. What's the one thing you tell your students over and over that no one believes? What do you wish you had heard as a novice writer?
I posted my pink flowers the other day, and here are my Boy and Neutral flowers for the swap I am hosting.
I put aside my scarf making plan, instead of making scarves for my whole family as Christmas Gifts, I started to make a blanket, or little blanket, or a cover for something... ??? or.. :)) It will turn out as soon as it will be finished, or I declare it to be finished.
We are well protected from those who would do us harm by capable, competent and determined protectors such as James Clapper, Director of our National Intelligence Center.
“V.S. Naipaul who has written scathingly about Indian history, seems to have something to say about everything but nothing on music. So he must be tone deaf. This leads to him making a mess of the Muslim contribution as you read his diatribe. But he doesn’t understand music, so what can he speak? Poor fellow. Totally at a loss.”
100 years on, and MP is one of the New Greatest Wonders of the World which receives around half a million visitors a year. Such a discovery surely deserves a prolonged celebration?
Tip #4 Healthy snacks to go. Make your popcorn snack and take it with you. Here is a different healthy snack idea. Create a popcorn trail mix by adding nuts – raisins - coconuts – dried fruits even vegan chocolate chips - make this healthy snack even healthier and more flavorful – its delicious. Also - try adding popcorn to granola. When eating popcorn choose healthier options for your popcorn. Be creative and try other ways to flavor your popcorn with healthier flavored oils, - healthy seasonings - and lower your sodium intake with a salt substitute or a salt free popcorn seasoning. Now you can put popcorn on your list of healthy snacks. And as always you must live well to be well — to your wellness
Serve: Doing something besides just trying to meet my own needs each day is so important. I could easily spend a day working, shopping, cooking and cleaning without ever really noticing those around me. I've been challenging myself lately to be more outgoing, little things like complimenting someone everyday and smiling at the people I come in contact with or starting a conversation with the person I'm standing in line with at the store. (I think the last one really annoys some people, so I don't push it.) This is an effort to truly see the people around me. Connecting with and serving people is a way to open my mind to the circumstances of others. It takes intentionality to see the plight of other people, whether it's the homeless man on the corner or the woman struggling to carry her groceries and lead her children at the same time, most of us are capable of lending a helping hand. I'm proud to be a part of a church family that regularly serves our community. What better way to connect with and learn about others?
Cut open and serve with toppings.
Our room has a big bed, with nice linens and a mosquito net hanging like a canopy. Mosquito nets are very important in this part of the world where malaria is active threat and therefore very important to me. You see, unlike everyone else in our group, Nellu and I are not taking anti-malaria pills. We met so many people who took them in South America and had a bad reaction to them – everything from weird hyper-negative dreams to hangover-like symptoms. Our extended travel also means that we’re visiting many parts of the world with different strains of malaria. Different strains of malaria can be resistant to different drugs, meaning that we would possibly have to invest in several different types of malaria pills, all which need to be taken for a prolonged period of time.
* Become a follower on my blog or you already are
* On a lightly floured work surface, roll each dough into a round disc (I used my hands). Press out any trapped air as you flatten the dough. Wrap each dough with one heaped tablespoon of the char siew filling. Pinch and seal the seam tightly. Place seam side down on a greased (or lined with parchment paper) baking tray. Space doughs two inches apart to allow them to expand. Cover with damp cloth or cling wrap and leave doughs to proof for the second time for about 40mins, or until double in size.
Okay, all that's fairly reasonable, and if Williams just left it there I'd be fine with it. Henry's dead, doesn't matter how, let's move on. But Williams doesn't do that. Instead, she builds an even more tenuous theory on top of her already shaky conclusion, and decides that either Henry must've committed suicide, or Mary killed him. The evidence for this is simply that Mary left the town where they were living and moved in with her parents -- she must've had something to hide!
In a large bowl whisk together the flour, baking soda, baking powder and salt; set aside.
As Nazi Germany attempts to annex Austria two childhood friends, one a Jew and one a German, find themselves on opposite sides.
How to Spot One in a Crowd: He’s the middle-aged man who is always pristine and shiny, and will often tell you to solve your problems with Jesus. He just comes off preppy, and invariably hates you for your sin. You knew which sin.
Great news in that Big Mama played in a reserve game this afternoon at Notts Forest where we won 2-1, with Big Mama assisiting in both goals. He may make the bench for the Swansea game at the weekend.
What You Gonna Do – Jim Noir
playlist specifically for my indoor endeavors.
Or, My Financial House of Cards Briefly Collapses.
At long last, on this final day of March, before PantheaCon 2012 become a distant memory of the hoary past for most people, I’m finally getting around to the final post of my six-part series debriefing the whole matter. So, to recap for those who have missed the other ones, I’ve already covered, on the side of things that were entirely my own to put on or take care of, the matter of the Inundation ritual each day (plus some other general things), and “The Ekklesía Antínoou and Queer Youth Spirituality” presentation that we put on the first day; and, on the side of things that I participated in or simply attended as well as wider and more general issues from this year’s con’, the “Modern Dionysian Initiation” by the Circle of Dionysos that I had a small role in, three intriguing presentations I attended, and the issue of transgender inclusion/exclusion at this year’s con’. I’ve also already done a post looking ahead to next year and some ideas I’m kicking around or some things I’m likely to take part in; to those I must add a potential Lupercalia, since the first day of the con’ is February 15th. So, we shall see how that goes…
Gas, alas, and Arkansas.
The DT is not obliged to leave comments on blogs with active word verification. Thanks xx
She gets on her knees
ALS – Advanced Low power Schottky
“You have to make a living,” she answered.
I've had this artwork for a few days, but I am just now getting around to posting it. I mentioned above that if you want a fine line or crisp edges you need to mask it.
1.Mix all ingredients together. Chill
“I will call your Dad and get him home…”
Chelsea thought that they had won
Whatever the source of your numbers (DB2 monitor or DB2 command output), what you want, for each pool, is the TOTAL read I/O rate per second. That's the sum of synchronous read I/Os (random + sequential) and asynchronous read I/Os (sequential prefetch + list prefetch + dynamic prefetch). This rate is your guide to appropriate use of buffer page-fixing, and your measuring stick to gauge the impact of, for example, increasing VPSEQT for a work file-dedicated pool, or increasing the size of a high-read-I/O pool by adding buffers taken from a low-read-I/O pool. In part two of my three-part memory-for-MIPS blog entry, we'll revisit read I/O rates in the context of boosting the aggregate size of a buffer pool configuration. Look for that next entry to be posted in a week or two.
He couldn’t stop laughing. What else does one do in the face of one’s own folly? I couldn’t stop laughing myself. What else does one do in the face of such sweet strategic victory? That made two of us, laughing hysterically with tears rolling down our faces over third anniversary dinner. What else do we do in the face of mutual checkmate?
Hope you all had a wonderful weekend! Ours was pretty low-key. My husband (bless his heart), painted the baby's nursery. It has taken 2 coats so far and we still need a third. We are going from bright blue and white stripes to a very soft pink. And note to self, don't listen to the paint store lady who tells you to get the paint with primer already in it...I don't think it works at all.
2. Write a poem about what you would like to be famous for.
I'm feeling nostalgic. Probably because I had to help Heather find a baby picture last night for a class assignment. Probably because this will be the last year with Paloma Elementary activities. Probably because this is my last year with a Primary aged trick-r-treater. Probably because my kids are growing up.
More soon--including Intention #3--very soon.
I knew, when I said yes to my Paul, that there would be some adjustments. You don’t go from being single and either dating or not dating (mostly not dating) for your entire adult life, and then suddenly promise yourself to someone for the rest of it and move in with him, and not expect to face some adjustments. There are some. Like–I have discovered my inner neatnik. I didn’t even know I had an inner neatnik. Compared to Mom, I still don’t. But let’s just say I’m acting a whole lot more domestic than I used to. All that was more or less to be expected, though. It’s going fine. But let’s be honest. They’re still adjustments. This, however, is the part I kind of forgot to think about:
It was a grand time and as I said, I do believe God heard us and will answer.
Meanwhile, the financial, political, and familial implications of millions of baby boomers reaching 65 continues to reverberate throughout our society. Not only are we all going to live longer, but there are so many more of us! What indeed are we all going to do with that gift of years?
Series sponsored by COSEE Ocean Learning Communities and Washington Sea Grant.
When I first saw the 2011 fall collection from Essie, this was the polish I knew I wanted, even though it's been done a hundred times. I just have a "thing" for taupe, mushroom-y colours like this one. I already have OPI Over the Taupe - which is by the way my fav' polish ever, and my first OPI ever! ;) - and I just thought I'd try a different brand, like challenging my ever-sweetheart-Over the Taupe ;) But now I know that these 2 are quite different: Glamour Purse has more gray in it and a subtle purple undertone, while Over the Taupe sticks to the classical beige undertones, looking basically like milk chocolate on my nails ;)
I know, I didn’t actually stamp on this card again. What is up with THAT? Anyway, there are 5 tiny ladybug brads in the center strip hiding among the holes of the circle border punch. This is a nice 5 minute card that can be sent any time but would also make a great Valentine’s Day card for your Love Bug.
Along with the change in our eating and shopping habits, I'm going to be giving this little blog a bit of a makeover as well. So please bare with me if you see links appearing and disappearing and a few wonky things over the next several days. Hopefully I'll get it all ironed out soon.
Some interesting things emerged in the process of doing this exercise for those few days. Actually, some of it was quite silly. For the second of the exercises, we came up with a “Row, Row, Row Your Boat” song, that we often did very briefly before beginning the exercise proper:
Anyway, onto the show and tell. I have had a fantastic few days in my sewing room, I have made sooo many gorgeous gifts for my babys and just couldn't help but try a few on my baby girl.
6The LORD shall count, when he writeth up the people, that this man was born there. Selah.
Yesterday I finally set up my scrap desk.
Base Polish: Catrice Carl Says Tres Chic
Long post follows:
Now, I'm here to arbitrarily pass unqualified judgment on commercials, not people, so whatever you like to put into your mouth is your own business. But I will say this: if you like eating at The Olive Garden, you have the same ability to distinguish flavor as does a dog that died in the 17th Century. If they issued eating licenses, you would have had yours revoked. When overpopulation becomes such a problem that hunting human beings for sport on prime-time television becomes a national phenomenon, you, the Olive Garden customers, will be the first into the Death Maze.
It was a couple of years ago. I forget what I was searching for now. Something tree-related - dreams of discovering more grainy black and white shots of loggers enveloped in Southern Ontario old growth. I was scanning the Niagara Falls online digital library when I saw a photograph that has been burned into my brain to this day. It was labeled, “The Old Indian Trail - Marker Tree. Townline Rd. (at Thorold - Stamford)
Water and humidity play an important role in contributing to building damage – which is why waterproofing is seen as a major trend in the construction industry from a customer-need point of view.
Doesn't this look a lot more like a red and gold than the actual table cover's poo-brown and pee-yellow? Or is it just me?
I sit back into the car. My colleague Gary Ashe is doing the driving. After a few seconds, he glances over at me and says: “She’s way past the crying stage, isn’t she?” “Yeah,” I reply quietly. We drive on, heading to our hotel, job done. Audrey Fitzpatrick walks into the bar and back to her search for her little girl. Back to her living nightmare.
You will also be introduced to a feature of the book that just might include you! Throughout the book are questions and answers that I posed to all my blog readers last year in survey questions on the sidebar of my blog. These provide a fascinating look at the creative community that we are all a part of.
Barack Obama is not a saint. He cannot snap his fingers and make the world a better place. He is a strong man who was handed all of the world's problems and is expected to fix them fast. Yet these problems are not just his, and not just Americas. We, as Citizens Of The World, all have a responsibility to do what we can to help make and inspire change. We cannot wait for the politicians of our country and other countries to make all the decisions and sit idly by hoping some good might come out of it. Blaming other people in other places will get us nowhere, nor will blaming ourselves. We all know the tasks ahead of us will be tough and many, but with inspiration in the form of my new president, I have hope.
Or is that moral about a horse?
The second experience I had was hearing Hisham Matar speak about his work at the Bath Festival of Literature. He discussed the process of writing In the Country of Men. So much of what he said sounded so right that I was a bit dazzled by it all. In much the same way that people with faith might feel when they hear an inspirational preacher. (As an aside, he read from his work and described being in the shade in Tripoli as being in 'grey patches of mercy' - yum.) What I took from the talk was that Matar is secretive about his work as he writes, then confused and surprised by it when it's done. He also said that to write was an act of praise; that by taking, naming and recording we were celebrating living.
Yesterday's Dead by Pat Bourke is a middle grade novel set in Toronto in 1918. Meredith Hollings is a 13-year-old girl who must leave her small hometown of Port Stuart to become a maid for a doctor's family in Toronto. Her father left and was killed in the war, and their family's store isn't bringing in quite enough. She regrets having to leave school, since she dreamed of becoming a teacher someday (and who will hire a teacher who didn't even go to high school?).
If I had to experience my life all over again, I wouldn’t miss a second of it. All the joys and the hardships that collectively form my life’s collage. It is simply breath-taking. From the days where the newest toys were life’s imperatives to the days where looking great(because good is never enough) or being adequately funny were tickets to making friends. Memories. The collective pool of experiences each tagged with emotions.
That, however, is a big "if." To make matters worse, the mutliverse explanation is not the sort of thing "we observe in the natural world." Near the end of his article Lightman writes:
On Monday, 27 people were killed in violence across Syria, including at least 20 who died in twin blasts targeting security buildings in Idlib city, most of them security force personnel, the watchdog said.On Monday, 27 people were killed in violence across Syria, including at least 20 who died in twin blasts targeting security buildings in Idlib city, most of them security force personnel, the watchdog said.
As consumers, we can order the beers. Talk nice about them at the bar. Urge our friends to drink them. Leave a nice tip. Compliment the brewers. Suggest you'd like to see more beers like that. Ask how they are made (attention homebrewers: DON'T tell the professional brewer how to lower the gravity and make a better beer). Find out how the brewer might get more flavor even while tossing in less grain.
Another high point for 2012...we have planned our Vacation-Palooza. We are going back to Negril, Jamaica. If thoughts of swimsuits and shorts isn't enough to motivate me to get moving (along with the above-mentioned events), then I am not sure what is! I really want to be rocking some new clothes for the trip!!! I CANNOT WAIT!!! The resort where we are staying is a five-star resort...so we feel like celebrities (though I like to think that we are much better mannered than some...we WILL sign autographs, even if you interrupt our lunch...:)).
I am so excited about being a guest blogger on this amazing blog!
And I think Syria and Iran have the motives to trigger such reactions in order to get away from the pressures applied by the international community on those regimes.
We ran into some major thunderstorms in Canada, where it had been humid and windy most of the day. Lucky for us, we were in the mall shopping and it didn't affect us that much. I have been slacking terribly these past few weeks-cleaning house, getting things packed for my trip in less than a month, and taking care of my grandsons as my son and his girlfriend recently split up. Not getting into reasons here, but he of course is upset-and has pretty much holed himself up in his apartment and I've been working on getting him out and about. (WHEN he answers the door that is!) Being a mother, I am worried-and hope that time will heal the wounds and at least they will be able to get along for their children. My ex is moving in with him soon, and although Daddy isn't the best influence there is out there-I feel better knowing he won't be alone.
Wait, what's that? "The drug is still a long way from even being tested on humans?" And why would that be? Because the government has to pay a bunch of bureauweenies to test it first. Oh whatever did we do before we had the FDA?
1) Remove a tablespoon of flour. I don't actually know if this is what helped my dough hold together, but because I use the dip-and-sweep (rather than weighing) method to measure flour, maybe that little bit of extra flour was contributing to the crumbliness.
'When your Daemon is in charge, do not try to think consciously. Drift, wait, and obey...' I knew this for the simple truth too. I concluded, from experience, that the Daemon always knows the detail and construction of a piece It has decided you will work on, but It cannot tell you directly. Or chooses not to tell. You are guided by images and feelings, steered along the path it wants you to follow by nudges and hints. When we are 'stuck' in a story, we have simply wandered from the path. If we stop trying to find it, if we try not to think consciously, but wait and let our thoughts drift – then the Daemon will guide us back to the path with more hints and nudges. When we struggle to find the way ourselves, we fall into mires and thorns, we get further and further from where we want to be, and the story 'goes dead under our hand'.
Life on the Muskoka River - I cannot express ow much I love this blog. Always fun, always honest, always a joy to read. Cathy Webster is the Canadian Blog Queen. A blog for anyone who enjoys good writing, insight that is uniquely Canadian, and a healthy dose of potty humour.
Creatures: 11
John 3:14-21 (NKJV) And as Moses lifted up the serpent in the wilderness, even so must the Son of Man be lifted up, that whoever believes in Him should not perish but have eternal life. For God so loved the world that He gave His only begotten Son, that whoever believes in Him should not perish but have everlasting life. For God did not send His Son into the world to condemn the world, but that the world through Him might be saved. He who believes in Him is not condemned; but he who does not believe is condemned already, because he has not believed in the name of the only begotten Son of God. And this is the condemnation, that the light has come into the world, and men loved darkness rather than light, because their deeds were evil. For everyone practicing evil hates the light and does not come to the light, lest his deeds should be exposed. But he who does the truth comes to the light, that his deeds may be clearly seen, that they have been done in God."
Jason Kidd has a protective order against his ex-best-friend of thirty years for an indefinite amount of time. Last May, the wife of his best friend went to their pastors for counsel. She had found a Tracfone which is a prepaid phone that had a text message in the draft messages stating that he had feelings for their best friend Jason Kidd’s daughter, Melanie.
Basically, you cut two matching holes—one in the leg and one in the vise chop—for the screw to slide through. The hub comes with a turned recess around which the garter fits like a collar. When you wrap the garter around the recess, then screw it to the vise jaw, it ensures that the screw and jaw move in and out as one unit.
This week's volunteer day at the organic farm involved counting to 9 about 900 times. I transplanted baby bok choy seedlings ~ spaced exactly 9 inches apart, in 3 perfect rows, in raised beds that go on for at least a mile.
A little later on, Nancy was on the phone with Maria Hawke, the Public Information Officer of the Tucson Police Department and Nancy grilled her as to who specifically put Isabel down and again asked if the mother looked in on Isabel before going to work in the morning.
His voice is reminiscent of an ESL instructor, which is exactly what Benjamin does for extra money back in France.
Thanks for stopping by, and for playing along with our sketch challenge. We hope that you will tell your friends about our challenge. The more the merrier, right? Enjoy your day, and I’d like to wish all the U.S. WMS fans a very Happy Thanksgiving. May we all pause and give thanks for the blessings in our lives.
I used to think it was because she didn't trust me. Didn't believe I knew how to be, out there, out beyond the ties that bound me to the umbilical cord of her love. I thought she didn't want me to grow, to achieve, to become all I wanted to be.
wherever you may roam.
You know the expression that one thing leads to another? Well, that seems to be true in a project I have decided to expand upon. My friend's mom started this endeavor a while back through facebook and I have really enjoyed it. Most of you know Georgie from Decisionally Challenged.....her mom is as sweet as she can be and a heart as wide as the Oklahoma skies, where she happens to be from. She post on facebook months when there is a senior citizen having a birthday and asks for cards to be sent along with a dollar bill.
Beautiful, endearing moments of my heart and I would not have it any other way.
graceful swing around the sun,
After accosted I was at 4am
You know, over the years, what I write here is always the truth.
Although most would be turned-off by it’s bulk and weight, the Xperia Play is so far the best multimedia Android gadget in it’s class currently in the market. But wait, the slide out physical controllers is found only in this phone, so it IS a class on it’s own.
I was ready to go
“Keep your voice low dammit! I know this is not the way it should be. But I don’t know what to do. And I have told Arham everything about this. We will meet after college and sort it out today itself.”
The first batch was in the oven and I forgot to add the flour....ooops.
Beautifully described exploration of the natural and spiritual landscapes of Late Roman Britain.
Now - onto the new challenge - here are the wonderful projects the team have come up with for your inspiration. We hope to see lots of lovely entries this time - if you are not sure of our rules please check them out on the sidebar. The winner of this challenge will be able to choose 5 Cardmadfairy images, why not pop over to the digi stamp shop now and check out which ones you would choose!
- A good book
The next day was Friday, nothing new actually as far as I could remember. Maybe watching one of the funniest movies for the year 2011, was the only fun stuff I did, except that it was not Friday anymore- i finished the movie at 1am, then tucked myself to bed. Mom kept telling me to sleep early for school resumes again this Wednesday, but I don’t know why I’m that stubborn. You can’t blame me;)
I'm going to keep this blog available to the public so that future CDH families can find it, and am going to get it printed into a book for Claire to have when she is older.
Could it be that a Spirit led believer has more insight into real life than the best-trained mind of this world? It not only is true but demonstrated many times over in the world’s history. One of these demonstrations is in our text for today, Acts 27:9-10.
____________________________________________________________
The truth is that the eggs used in the studies were powdered egg, which contains oxidised cholesterol which we now know causes atherosclerosis. Dietary cholesterol such as found in eggs is not oxidised.
As a future parent, I am going to pass along the truths about tiger moms: “Child, don’t run away from me. You may despise me now for my viciousness, but once you get older, you will love this old tigress that has reared you to be at the top of the food chain in the animal kingdom!”
Coming back to the subject of depression in the youth, you realize it’s just the fact of lack of self-confidence, a black cloud in the clear sky. You become scared of the fact that other people maybe better than you and break down. You hesitate to do what you think is right. You start doubting your own judjment. But that’s the point in your life in which you have to fight with yourself and make sure that you don’t back down but actually stay firm and keep your ground. People will be hitting you from all the directions but those are just the tiny bumps of the road called life.
Some of the biscuits I have marked to try are: Sweetie Biscuits, Chocolate Bourbons, Coconut Cherry Macaroons, Chocolate Flapjack Biscuits, Pear and Ginger Fairings, Mini Christmas Puddings, Boozy White Chocolate and Cranberry Cookies and Healthy Monkeys.
$1 off Time Magazine
Kellan is about 16 lbs and still short. He is able to wear size 3-6 month still, but I have been putting him in 6-9's because having different size clothes in the room is getting impossible! Maddox is about 18 lbs and he is tall. He is going into size 9-12 month clothing! They both wear size 3 diapers. They eat baby food once each day (in the evenings) but eat almost 2 jars each! Otherwise they are still getting 100% breast milk.
Q016) What kind of man is your ideal type?
I'm glad that you are visiting I am the last stop on this amazing list of designers. If you just stopped by please hop to the beginning which would be Lisa at http://handmadewithlove-lisa.blogspot.com/.
3. Spinach salad with strawberries, blueberries, almonds, vinaigrette, and grilled meat
Three women were being detained on suspicion of battery when members of the crowd set upon officers and tried to free them, he said.
They were about eight weeks old. Most of them were covered in black and white fuzz, but a couple of them were gold and white, just like Toby. A thousand mosquitoes stung my legs. I wiped sweat off my forehead and picked up a blonde puppy. She had a round belly and white paws that flailed in the air.
In the case of a spouse or significant other, a safety plan must be created through LACASA. This is a form that outlines the steps that will be taken if there is any type of threat or violence that would happen in the future.
I'm not sure who it is, whether my browser or google itself but when I started typing the title for this blog entry it decided that the ch of cheese was the same of the ch at the end of sandwich and therefore decided I might be typing Bacon Sandwich again. Tunrs out Bacon Sandwich is a title for an older blog entry (the one where I posted an image of Muhammed) but it seems strange that search bars are trying to become more intelligent. Most of the time I don't need to repeat the same search over and over so why am I being haunted by searches past? It'll probably come in handy one day I suppose.
Today, I know a different child. Zane is eager to laugh, always joining in anyone's laughter as if he knows exactly what the joke was. He's affectionate with family and close friends, and he loves to "pay??" (That's "PLAY").
So they pointed the camera at me, and shot off random questions.
Even some of the Brisbane suburbs we'd walk up and down for our morning stroll, had glorious gardens - especially those with Heritage Listed Queenslanders on stilts. The Botanical Gardens were like a shrine to all gardens throughout Brisbane. It just said "Zen". It was peace, harmony and balance, all wrapped up in one.
Wondered why their image came?
Seems like an age since I got in my crafty room. But today being Bank Holiday and my hubby at work it is the ideal opportunity.
They started me on monitors for both babies heartbeats and contractions and they did a test that confirmed it was, in fact, amniotic fluid. I had suffered from preterm premature rupture of membrane (pPROM). The OB came in and did an u/s which did little more than confirm both babies were still breech and she did a physical exam and found that my cervix was still closed. I was apparently contracting, but didn’t feel them at all – I was 3-4 minutes apart when I came in! I was immediately given a steroid shot (the first in a two shot series) and they started me on magnesium sulfate to stop the labor. A neonatologist came in to talk with Chris and I and we were essentially told that at 25w3d gestation, the babies had a 50/50 chance of survival. We were heartbroken. But, the team of doctors (OBs, MFMs, etc…) were going to work as hard as possible to keep me pregnant for as long as they could.
The ogoh-ogoh cost anywhere from $100 to thousands of dollars, and can range anywhere from discrete displays in front of the house, to the size of a house. And while these clean the spiritual environment, folks clean out their houses, the streets get swept and everything is polished up for the holiday. Kind of like spring cleaning back home, but taken to the extreme.
I've used one of Mo's newest little fairies ain't she just a little cutie?, I've coloured her with my trusty Copics.
Charon.
Right now I feel as though nothing could help me as much as the opinion of more experienced people --that and some writing classes. I'm currently trying to find out if there are any colleges that have writing classes open to the public. I'm willing to invest my time and money to learn if only I can find someone to teach me, so you know of any creative writing classes or workshops in the South Florida area, please let me know!
The answer: No. “The congressman’s statement stands.”
Now it is time to sit quite, face to face with thee, and to sing
I might also have mentioned the Prospect of Whitby's literary and artistic associations - Pepys, Turner, Dickens, Whistler and Daniel Farson - along with an incident there in 1996 that wasn't my finest hour.
Since we eat dessert pretty much 7 nights a week, I like to make recipes that are healthy. They also have to be husband and kid approved. Most of the time there is no butter or white flour, and very little sugar. Some nights we go all out with the full fat versions or make a trip to Dairy Queen for a dipped cone, but most nights we keep it healthy. Healthy enough they could technically be made mid-day and called a snack if you prefer!
But I still really identify with the first phrase. An inner battle rages between trust and worry. Trust dispels worry. But much like the popup figures in an arcade shooting gallery, the worry just tends to keep popping back up!
It’s not a very common special dance so make sure your photographer and videographer are aware that it is taking place and when so they capture it on film.
I tried doing Google Docs for sponsor information this month, because Cassie does,
I am a big fan of baby-wearing and do it as often as possible, even around the house! I love it and so does the Velociraptor. I love being close to her just as much as she does to me. Though some people would say I spoil her with this I say that is where babies belong! She is a well-balanced baby, she is not always in the ring-sling she gets some much needed tummy-time too! Baby-wearing helps me get stuff done around the house and keeps my baby happy so in my opinion two rights can not make a wrong =)
Parking: Valet (really best option in area) $10 for up to 4 hours, Mon-Sat
Whew! Can you believe it's Thursday already?
It always interests me that every language and culture (or those I know about) seems to have a word everyone knows, but is considered unspeakable in polite company. Take the F word. You know what it is (if you don't, you've probably just arrived from a different planet, in which case you'll have no idea what I'm talking about), but you wouldn't expect me to write it in this post. You're right. I'm not going to.
It’s not destined to be
Question 1: Adam Mackowiak from Ely City Community College
Well, I didn't get to the end yet -- the part about how Lucky, the buff Orpington hen, ended up dying.
That the said Constitution shall never be construed to authorize Congress to infringe the just liberty of the press or the rights of conscience; or to prevent the people of the United states who are peaceable citizens from keeping their own arms..." - Samuel Adams, 1789
Healthy Hair Food No. 4: Nuts
We all laughed when Javier told us that he was endemic to the Galapagos Islands. I guess I can say that my sisters and I were introduced into the United States by our parents, who migrated here.
“Pyjamas and tracksuits are sloppy so I only wear Abercrombie & Fitch tracksuits to go to my yoga class. If you dress comfortably, you don’t get the look.”
and beautifully layered drones combined with light finger picking sets up a
And wore fancy stiletto shoes that she took off exactly 30 seconds after arriving at the reception.
When that someone’s had a dream
Before the 1998 NFL Draft, there was much debate about who would be the better professional quarterback – Ryan Leaf or Peyton Manning. My answer back then to all my friends was Manning over Leaf. I remember one of those friends calling me a few years back to recall the football debates we had as college teammates and telling me that I called this one right (as I often do! ha!). It wasn’t that I didn’t think that Leaf wouldn’t be a good NFL QB, I just thought from the games that I had seen, Manning would be better. There was no question that Leaf was a talented, strong-arm QB coming out of Washington State. In retrospect the biggest question shouldn’t have been about his talent but his mental capacity.
Wishing you and yours a happy, healthy and long 2012 (I am sure it is not just me that feels as though the year evaporates?).
Unfortunately, what always seems to go wrong when authors set out to tell a Message instead of a Story: constant nobility and morality gets boring. There's no authenticity. And the book drags on.
Here is a photo of the car ride back from the beach.
Did gyre and gimble in the wabe;
Here is some Thursday Lucitenspiration. If you ever wondered about the history of lucite, there is a great article on the subject on Apartment Therapy.
"This award is for bloggers who shine their light throughout the Blogoshere. Some do it with humor, others with creativity, and others with their kind and thoughtful natures. We all know more than a few of them so why not give them some recognition?
If you've been following me on Twitter or Goodreads, then you'll know that I did have a problem with one character. Four. I full on despised him in this book. He is so controlling that he borders on abusive. The way he treated Tris was disgusting, and he came across as a giant hypocrite. He did improve a little at the end, but he has A LOT of making up and apologising to do because I am so upset and disgusted by his behaviour. He even went as far as to give Tris an ultimatum at one point, and I wanted to smack him over the head. How DARE he?!
In a postscript to the correction they admitted that the original Canadian study had referred to fishing tackle, not plastic debris, as the threat to the marine environment.
admitting their arrogance and flaws,
05 Dick’s Slow Song
First, the most obvious difference between men and women’s views of sex:
If I say it’s an adult novel – or rather, don’t say it’s YA – how will an agent feel when they read the query and the sample pages? This author has no idea of her own market?
Suicide
GTO will be produced by Fuji TV and it will be aired this July.
A sudden sense of deja vu overtakes a moment, haven't I done this before?
I will be using fondant to create the characters and place them on top of the cupcakes. i will be making Red Velvet Cupcakes. The recipe came from a good friend of mine who is a baker herself and creates most amazing cupcake and cake creations.
If you are thinking about opening an EdVest or Tomorrow’s Scholar account to begin saving for college for yourself or for your child, you have until December 31st to do it and get a tax break on your 2011 taxes. If you have an account and haven’t contributed to it yet this year, do it now!
Gotta become skinny and look like this in August!!!
When a person is saved, he cannot lose his salvation. All of your arguments presume that one can lose salvation.
I remember pregnant women in the past talk about “nesting” and getting ready for the baby. I always wondered what the “nesting” entailed. Sounded interesting enough but all I could imagine was Big Bird, sitting in his nest….just sitting there. Although I do sometimes find myself just sitting there, I have thoroughly enjoyed the “nesting” stage. It has been such a holy time, as well as a trusting time, and has challenged me to wait with the Lord. In resting with and in Him, I have found peace about the unknowns that are coming in the next week or two. Although I do struggle with fear daily, for the most part, it has been awesome.
Constructed with $5 million from the Saudi Embassy and run by Muslim Brotherhood leaders, Dar al-Hijrah is a terror mill and a direct threat to national security. Yet the only thing standing in the way of the mosque and justice is CAIR, which also happens to be a threat to national security.
Another busy week for BM!. We meet this evening from 5pm for japes and breezes until 10.30pm and then we meet again on Saturday for larks and wheezes from 10am all day. Any japes and breezes not exhausted by Wednesday evening must be preserved for another month. Saturday is for larks and wheezes only. Please do not bring japes and breezes on Saturday as refusal may offend.
"We want to protect key institutions (such as) schools and hospitals," said Cwele.
Whoot! Both ladies were extremely generous. Their blogs are fabulous, so check 'em out.
The gantry was retracted overnight, revealing the Delta II standing on the launch pad. Launch managers and controllers are at their consoles now and liquid oxygen is flowing into the rocket’s first stage.
For me, I remember this beginning as a child riding to school past muddy fields and clouded skies in the early spring. Somehow I shifted to trying to see this landscape as something beautiful and I began to appreciate the angles of the tawny broken corn stalks left from the past year, the patterns of the clouds and the way it all hung together from the melting snow to the first shoots of green coming up through the brown. I was lucky–if I hadn’t been looking for the beauty, I don’t think I would have caught all the tiny moments of seasonal change–the first sprouting of the winter wheat coming back, eagles circling overhead on their annual migration, those mornings when the temperature of the river and the air was such that tendrils of mist rose off the river into the trees nearby and other mornings when the early sunlight tinted every bit of frost and dew a beautiful bright golden color. Watching the seasons is still one of my great loves and continually inspires me in my photography.
New York and North Dakota could be added to the Democratic list as well depending on candidate recruitment. I'm still skeptical about California but we'll see.
I got a little creative with things in the fridge the other day and this is the result: pepperoni pizza monkey bread. It was pretty tasty, and I'm sure I will try it again. Once again, it gave me reason to own a bundt pan, but if you don't, you could also make these in individual serving sizes in muffin tins (baking time will be much lower).
No and no, and a thousand times, NO.
An example of the methodology:
2, Prolonged UST
hand towel hook - I have bought two and have still not found "the one"
5. Legend Of A Mind
But sometimes books and films substitute real emotion for sentimentality. They sell their characters and their readers short. They fall into The Parent Trap.
Angel and Bella were among the last to be found. Angel had been hanging for dear life to the stern of one of the other boats and her fingers had to be prised off the edge before she could be moved.
02 - They Look Back Upon the Burning 2:17
Why do we cast away “drugs” that Nature has seen fit, just to take from it, patent it, and use it later?
I continued my search for the perfect beautiful setting.
So when I was shopping I bought a jar of Arenkha, along with a small packet of blinis and a tub of creme fraiche, and I had a (virtually) instant canape.
The older I get, the more I miss you. There must be something about better understanding the struggles and the hard times of life ~ and wishing that I had paid more attention and spent more time on my knees then than I did. But here we are. The journey for me continues, and I know that my tears will continue to flow from time to time … until they will be dried by Jesus Himself as I am met by you at that great Gate … Someday.
A 60 quarter mash tun isn't huge. That's enough for around 250 barrels of standard-strength (for the day) beer. The big London brewers had larger tuns than that. The weekly capacity of 4,000 plus 2,500 quarters is the equivalent of about 25,000 barrels per week. Or 750,000 barrels annually.
3. What's the best and worst thing about being a children's writer?
SATURDAY MAY I 2010 11 AM
Arrange the animals on the poster size canvas. Mae picked 24" x 23" for this project. Iron the animal silhouettes directly onto the canvas. Make sure your iron is clean, you don't want any stain on your artwork. You can also use a sheet of white copy paper to protect the canvas.
More than a few observers have asked why anyone should trust Gleick’s scientific judgment if his judgment about how to deal with climate skeptics is so bad. -Gleick’s defense of his motives would be laughable if it weren’t so pathetic: “My judgment was blinded by my frustration with the ongoing efforts​—​often anonymous, well-funded, and coordinated​—​to attack climate science and scientists and prevent this debate, and by the lack of transparency of the organizations involved.”
When I get an email from my first father, I read and enjoy. Rather than write back right away, I wait a day. I reread the next day. Sometimes I read it much differently the second day because I really understand what he’s saying as opposed to just being happy that I managed to get an email. Sometimes it reads the exact same way. If I did write a response on the same day (I don’t send them) I usually get rid of it. I write my response the day after I get the email so that it won’t hang over my head. I answer any questions that he’s asked (I love it when he asks questions because it shows that he wants to know about my life) and think of a few of my own. I share small bits of my life. And then I walk away. When I come back later, I nearly always cut half the email. I tend to write a lot, sometimes too much. So I cut the parts that don’t quite fit or the ones that no longer make sense to me. And I schedule it for a few days later (thank you Gmail for that handy feature!). Sometimes I’ll go back and reread and fix things. Sometimes I don’t because I’ve already given it a once over. It all depends on my mood and how busy I am.
...27 translations later,
So currently I am meant to be writing my End of Year Essay due in this Friday, but I read something that I had to comment on. I am writing my essay on the Holocaust and the theological implications and in one of my books I read this: “The world is indifferent to humans”. But this is wrong, the world is not indifferent to humans, it just exists- in fact it is the people who are indifferent to the world and to their fellow beings. This statement was made by Richard Rubenstein who rejected belief in God and his belief in Judaism because of the events of the Holocaust and the fact that he came to the conclusion that Hitler was the agent of God which he refused to believe. However, I disagree with this view completely because what about our responsibilities? Why does it have to be God who is blamed? What about the responsibility of the people who were involved? Those who committed the crimes? I am not absolving God from responsibility as it raises the long held argument of the problem of evil in which many theodicies have been created. I am not denying the question of where was God in all this? It is an important question! These aren’t simple questions and there are no real answers, but what there is out there is the knowledge that people did commit these crimes. People did stand and watch. People did do nothing.
THE SECRETARY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL RESOURCES, THE REGIONAL TECHNICAL DIRECTOR FOR LANDS, LANDS MANAGEMENT BUREAU, REGION VI, PROVINCIAL ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL RESOURCES OFFICER, KALIBO, AKLAN, respondents.
The clock ticks.....when is Dato' Seri Najib going to announce the dissolution of Parliament.
Acrylic Jewels
to my room to hear your tune
BARKLOUSE
The National…I can’t stop listening to those guys. Also, Arcade Fire and Edward Sharpe & The Magnetic Zeroes are big in the rotation at the moment.
Hope to see you!!
As the pages of my life turn
Alex: I can answer many questions about reservations, but you can find additional contact information when you select the appropriate topic on this Web page. View Page
25. Through the fence, between the curling flower spaces, I could see them hitting. —William Faulkner, The Sound and the Fury (1929)
At first, I was a bit disappointed that Bialik didn’t get into more of the how-tos of gentle discipline or other more formal tenets of AP. However, as the hour-and-a-half progressed, I became grateful for the direction that the talk took. It was interesting to learn the reasons behind what motivated Bialik to write her story for those interested in learning more about AP, and it was lovely to listen to someone talk about the topic in just about the least judgmental and non-threatening way possible for such a potentially divisive subject. She not only told personal anecdotes to support her personal reasons for subscribing to the AP lifestyle, but she being a neuroscientist also gave many evidential accounts of why an AP-based parenting path can grow the best human brains possible (her dissertation at UCLA was a neuroscientific investigation of Prader-Willi syndrome).
First, let’s see the Buffett Rule for individuals. Then the Buffett Rule for corporations. That would be progressive. And that would be progress.
Have you ever had a conversation with someone only to learn their opinion consists of: ”I work at my job for 40 years then I die”? In my opinion, this kind of behavior isn’t living, this is mediocrity.
b - A straight tape to digital transfer. No EQ or noise reduction applied.
21. Move Something
The Secret Life of Walter Mitty – 2
I was young. I sort of lost my mind. I reached in his mouth to see if it was still there. In those moments, I wondered if he would need surgery or his stomach pumped. In that moment, I decided I couldn’t take care of a child, if I let him eat carpet then what was next? I concluded he should be removed from my home. I said with tears in my eyes and fear in my heart, “Oh no, he ate carpet.”
Then I walked around and spent an hour in Primark buying a few bits. That is an amazingly cheap shop and the quality is ok.
Their location will be fantastic for the Olympics and as other bloggers have said having a craft beer bar in a shopping centre is definitely a step further forward for the advocates of great beer in the UK. If you are out East give it a visit.
Food, family, wine, wedding talk, my yummy neices..and I’d say that’s a good wrap on a great weekend.
We talk into
BLAH!
Dear friends of ours are raising funds to give a child a loving, Christian home. If just 10,000 people gave just ONE DOLLAR, they will meet their goal! Please consider giving a dollar,* then spread the word!
The bread stick is around 5" in length and around 0.5" in diameter.......errr, bread stick ah....dun think of 'something' else lorr....ha ha ha.
The more people we can help establish a business the more we can help alleviate poverty. Currently we have four outstanding loans and will soon be able to make another loan. For every party held we will make a loan to another person or group from Kiva.org as a way to continue helping as many people are we can. For more information about Kiva.org visit their website at www.kiva.org.
The December 14 motion could be used as a case study in the dangers of flawed procedures. Nifong had ordered the police to orchestrate a lineup confined only to suspects (the 46 white lacrosse players). Is it any wonder that the results he received were worthless?
Don’t feel bad, it took me years to get this one, too…
Nate: Mama, look at all the colors in the sky!
Because Adrian is very talented. And every part is amazing.
Logo
I will not make this letter about all the horrific things that you have put me through because it’s just not healthy for me to relive it. I am finally at the point in my life where I am letting it all go. I know that our relationship failed because of you and your addictions and your lack of ability to love not because of anything that I did or didn’t do. I tried to make things work, I tried fostering a relationship between us and between you and my children, you were just unable and/or unwilling to allow it to happen. I am not sure why, nor do I care at this point because I am done. Completely. I do not want you to ever contact me or my children any longer. We do not want any of your lame attempts at saying that you care because we know differently. Yes even my children know. Do you realize that they place bets on how long you will stay when you drop something off because they know that it is a lame attempt on your part? They realize that your boyfriend who beats the shit out of you is more important than they are. They realize that you care more about grandchildren who you may never again get the chance to see (Hailey and Parker) than you do about them. So I leave you with these parting words from a very fitting song…”Perfect” by SimplePlan, as this sums up just about everything that I have been feeling over the past 25+ years.
We also visited my dear Mum, twice, caught up with my sisters news… did not see my brother (now there is a problem – will talk about it later). Did a little bit of shopping. Himself wanted to buy lots of things but I did have to remind him that we will be moving house so I did not want to have too much on the shelves or in the freezer, and…., we will be in the UK again in November for daughter no 1’s 40th birthday. He sighed a lot and gave me black looks!
The cataclysm hardware requirements normal iѕ standard with regаrdѕ to processing speed, storage space, sound and visual appeal. Gamers who utilize computers fоr video games wіll immediately identify the difference in thе experience based оn the settings uѕеd in the hardware setup of thе computer.
Bk Bridge Park CAC Meeting
Have a good weekend our Noah bear
I think what struck us the most was the students’ enthusiasm and confidence when discussing their research and process — and how using DH they were able to go “beyond” traditional scholarship. For most of the students, this was their first time using DH tools and methods. It was also great just to see examples of DH work in action. As Eric pointed out, examples like these make the concept of DH more concrete and demonstrate a need for infrastructure and/or centers to support students and faculty working on digital projects.
So I did some research, found out some more details, and started talking nonstop about this event - which I discovered was the Parrotfish Festival on Farasan Island. I had enough other people intrigued to try and organize a trip, but the first year it didn't work out. So as this April approached, I once again tried to interest people. And I was lucky to have the opportunity to go this year, and as part of a regional outreach trip for work, too!
"God does not further our spiritual life in spite of our circumstances, but in and by our circumstances." - Oswald Chambers
Most of the cleaning supplies in the pictures were here when we moved in 4 years ago. I do the majority of my cleaning with water, vinegar and baking soda. For tough stuck on food I use coarse sea salt. You could lick the stove it's so clean after (with no fear of poisoning yourself)
Our early thirties was a period when H and I spent many a Sunday afternoon engrossed in conversation on Hampstead Heath or encased in the inviting darkness of a North London cinema. I've lost count the number of movies we've seen together. I don't want to picture the mountainous heap of sweet pop corn that got scoffed. Actually H never really ate pop corn, she always used to smuggle in a packet, or three, of Mintolas. I've no idea where she purchased them from. I still haven't located anywhere in London that stocks them.
But who needs Internet access with a beautiful view like that!
The kitchen, which has white bead board on the back wall and doors, also has an adjustable clock, hooks to hang hot pads or cups,
no longer do i feel like part of this house is mine.
You can tell Muz is always up for a chuckle. It’s an approach appreciated by Australians, who apparently rule the roost when it comes to Muz’s audience preferences.
moonpie
Above: One faction is run by ‘Willem’ who uses the Christian Communal Survival approach, whereby all the residents share the daily cash they earn from odd jobs and selling homemade items, buy their food together, cook in a communal kitchen and pray together each morning for courage to survive another day…
Either way, you have to expect a low strike rate, especially when you’re still learning your craft. You wouldn’t expect to play Carnegie Hall after a couple of years on the piano. Give yourself a chance; start with the smaller competitions/publications, which will give you a sense of whether this is for you or not.
“Yes,” he said. His eyes were bright and his skin glowed. The mark on his wrist was gone. I touched where it had been. He leaned over to kiss the place on my neck where he’d bitten me, and I shivered all over. “Soon.”
2006 Most New Councillors (Barking and Dagenham)
Their flowers the tenderness of patient minds,
The next 5-6 miles were kind of a blur. I remember stopping at the 16th mile (or maybe the 18th?) to take Advil, which had kind of melted in my pocket by then, but other than that it was a fairly boring part of the course so I focused more on my breathing, my stride, and getting lost in my music.
We're at a moment in history when every day, politicians are telling us what 'we' can't afford, what 'we' must stop having, how there isn't the money to pay for the kinds of hospitals, schools, housing and social welfare we've had in the past. In fact, they say, there are all sorts of drains on the economy, dragging us down: people on disability benefit who aren't as sick as they make out (the politicians say), the non-industrious poor who won't work and so on. They keep telling us that the problem is 'the deficit' ie the debt created by a shortfall in what has been raised by taxation - the old 'kitty', the pot. And notice, time and again they tell us about a ratio: the ratio between that debt ('deficit') and the Gross Domestic Product - the amount of money raised by the sale of all the goods made in the UK.
I am learning to rely on Jesus to fill me with His joy in all circumstances. Praying the Fruit of the Spirit has been instrumental in helping me to really concentrate on the gifts of the Father. When praying in the Spirit, our trials become opportunities to see God’s amazing grace and goodness. He prepares a table in front of our enemies. He equips us to handle all situations and trials.
All of this happens in about 2 minutes and 20 seconds. What will then happen is a back and forth exchange between the two as you complete missions. Sometimes you get lucky and get a cool CG battle to watch for 10 seconds! And “sexy” mutants.
"We wanted it to sound older, like an album from the 50s or 60s."
I can totally see herbing it up a bit, maybe some fresh thyme or chopped chives.
The hard working pixie who has to protect his family, too.
Am I the fearless girl you think you know?
Winners: please email me via the link on my sidebar with your name, address and the prize pack you won.
Until then and Happy Thanksgiving!
Monica Hart is a Lifestyle and Design Specialist based in the Pacific Northwest. Inspired by a love of old-world home and garden design, entertaining, and rustic, earthy meals, Monica’s distinct approach led this former television news gal to create La Famiglia Design, a blog showcasing her daily heartfelt reflections on home and lifestyle inspiration tailored for contemporary times.
Roy: Not as tough as you, huh?
Night Owl Mama
I signed up for this. I am not complaining. I am content, thankful, blessed, and everything in between.
First, the understanding of a national identity attached with physical circumcision is important. The repeated use of “the circumcision” to refer to ethnic Jews is consistent with that interpretation. The nature of that transition from the Old Covenant to the New is important to the overall discussion, but it is outside the locus of this essay. Nevertheless, as Ephesians 2:11-22 so vividly portrays, the Gospel breaks down the “dividing wall of hostility” (v. 15) that is built between “the circumcision” and “the uncircumcision” (v. 11). Paedobaptist and credobaptists will agree on this point: the gospel reconciles us to God and across national boundaries to one another. It’s crucial that difficult theological issues be discussed, but we can never forget the blood of Christ that enabled us to know and love God while we were still sinners.
Because of an early cold morning Christmassy feeling, coziness of house and the warmth of candle and coffee.
she has grown length wise and is still the same % for weight. no concerns. she's small but she's always been small.
If I wanted that type of medical care I would have visited Dr. Google. There I could have diagnosed myself with feline leukemia and really scared the piss out of myself.
lying up here in the gloom-tinted grey,
I'm back from St. Augustine (and have been for a week and a half), and I've finally gotten the time to sit down and get some pictures uploaded for your enjoyment. :)
One slipper, it’s true, could solo on, like a Wise without a Morecambe, a Kim without a Mel, the concept of the number 5 with one less plastic Jackson. Its sole, unlike that of its partner, has not prised free from the faux faux suede in a totally unmendable way, and I could conceivably hop around the place in it with my other foot tucked snugly in a blanket or tea cosy. But this would be like David Beckham continuing to play football for B and C teams until he’s forty-five. Plus, I don’t hop too well these days, even when roused to anger by the thought of having to shell out hard-earned cash on a new pair of dinky foot muffs.
Tiote Cabaye Gutierrez
Another way to say goodbye, when there were so many ways
Webisode 2 will be here shortly. . . I hope to have it completed by this coming Monday or Tuesday. In the meantime, here is a little preview image. As you can see, I will be painting an eye and talking about ideas related to the process.
I think it is really time for me to start living like I used to and move on.
"Do you not know that your bodies are temples of the Holy Spirit, who is in you, whom you have received from God? You are not your own; you were bought at a price. Therefore honor God with your bodies." 1 Corinthians 6:19-20
This month our fearless i {heart} papers design team challenge coordinator, Deb, challenged us to use the Color Blocking technique for our card or project. I know there are many variations of this, and some are more clean and simple than what I ended up doing. Anyway…
I put my boots on.
You've been to a 60th.
The December issue of many vintage magazines have special Christmas hairdo instructions, not surprising given in many ways people apparently dressed up more (or better!) in those days than we do now. I'm going to cheat a bit and post a few pages from Hair Secrets from December 1970, so just past the end of the decade but a very nice how to do typical aspects of fancy Christmas styles. Take a look:
The Christian Endeavor Principles
Favorite Website- Pinterest (just to clarify...he liked finding recipes on there, not crafts), :) Cougarfan.com, ajc.com
4 cups bread flour
SPREADS
88, high humidity, have a 20% possibility for rain tomorrow, sure could use it. 30% tomorrow, that’s the highest possibility for the next 5 days. We’ll see. Frogs are crooking, hope they’re asking for rain.
I adore this corner of the Luxembourg Gardens. I've pointed this quirky, curious sight out to many friends and (like me) they've been surprised that they've never noticed it before. This is the Medici Fountain in the eastern side of the gardens, commissioned around 1630 by Marie de Medici. Notice how the water looks like it's on an angle? Clever, isn't it. It's the sly design. Those nifty Parisians... Always got an aesthetic trick up their sleeve...
Early Days(1980) is about the slide into cunning senility of a politician whose life fell apart when he missed his chance to become PM. - the remainder of his life was spent in bitter reminiscing.
As the ships travel north, they pause by waterfront communities celebrating with festivals, music and parties. Today (Tuesday), they'll arrive at Beacon/Newburgh, where they'll stay for educational programs til late afternoon. See the whole schedule here.
The Clintons and the Carters pay a visit to the Oval Office. I love the rug that President George Bush created for this office, I hope the Obamas keep it. I wonder what Clinton and Emmanuel are saying???
The pretty butterfly is cut from the same cartridge at 2" plus the layers. I layered the flower on a scallop circle that was cut from the Spellbinders-lacy circles dies and the flower using My Creative Time ~Rolled flower die. I added a double bow using ribbon from both 3 Girl JAM~baby girl and My Craft Spot ~vanilla bean together which I really liked the look and then layered another beautiful flower onto that.
the only problem that I had was where to join the last round to the inner sections.
Nakul and Sahdev (good looking/handsome).
In May 2009, the tenants were informed that their landlord is going to appeal the case. If he wins, Tivoli Towers will no longer provide affordable housing for this diverse community of people. “Tivoli: A Place We Call Home” aims to put a face and identity on Tivoli’s tenants at the onset of gentrification in this Brooklyn neighborhood and will help answer questions such as: Who lives there? Where do they come from? What experiences have they had living in this building? How do they use this space that they call home? What are their aspirations for this community that they have created? What contributions do they make to society? How have they been affected by the lack of investment in their building? What does gentrification mean to them?
“The hospital at Camp Bastion, the UK’s main military base in Helmand, occasionally treats enemy forces that have been wounded.
Formerly The Far Side, The Queens Head as it is now is far removed from The Grosvenor. Superficially it’s nicely renoavted, as premium lagers and one token ale. Adnams. My heart sinks at the sight of it and we opt for a cool pint of Erdinger. Large Gorillaz canvases adorn the walls, and although they are now on their third album, its still a touch that you would expect in about 2000. My thoughts overall would be that its nice. Not exceptional. It's proximity to the Brixton Academy would probably make it a good stop for a pre gig drink but otherwise I wouldn't make a point of stopping by. With that in mind we declined a second round and moved on.
This is a Poets United prompt-based poem. Please visit their website by clicking this link, to read more responses to the Thursday Think Tank photo and prompt.
by me. Alive and well is what I care about. Right now that means
To be honest with you this was a tough one, because I absolutely l.o.v.e all my Flourishes Stamps and narrowing it down was really hard. I might just have to make a few more cards this week to add it to the challenge this week :) !!! The winner is Country Charm Labels. The sentiment is from the With Gratitude Set. The DP in the background is from the Prima Paper Song Collection. Next I added some *faux stitiching & edge distressing*, a Doily, some handmade Flowers, Ribbon, Button and Silver Pearls.
And it’s not really so much in western terms. Sam is such a nice guy and he’s so charming and informative that fine, I’ll pay the supplement. But I know I’m getting ripped off, and that puts an unpleasant aftertaste to everything.
I think I've done all of the above! Well when YOU GUYS tell me to take advantage of being single, I think you may mean something a little different. ;)
But to answer the question, we are not meant to live sinfully. We cannot just say, “Well, Jesus saved me so now I can live any way I want because I’m already covered.” (Check out Romans 6 for a better argument on this topic.)
Over the last generation, worker productivity has gone up as have corporate profits and CEO pay packages — but the wages for ordinary working folks, the people doing the work, have fallen. That’s not capitalism. That’s corruption.
-Once you find a pattern you like, cut out the flannel and terry cloth and sew right sides together. My original plan was to sew the two together and just pink the edges...didn't work. Terry cloth sheds like crazy!
According to an e-mail sent directly to this blog, Rumplestiltskin possesses a magical object, a chantment, that extracts pollution from seawater without damaging marine plant or animal life. According to Rumplestiltskin, the object, a baby's teething ring, was a 'gift' and came with written instructions on how to use it safely.
Samsung also warn against updating your device while running a customized or unofficial firmware on it. Apparently, unexpected problems might arise during installation.
The other part(s) included a Yakima roof rack, paddles, life vest, and other essentials no kayaker wants to be on the water without.
Do they stop to ask how her day is really going?
Number who probably perished, 1,312.
Then we can get back to eating.
Recent football events involving John Terry and Luis Suarez (separate incidents) have caused a major stir in football. John Terry was caught on camera shouting racially abusive words towards Anton Ferdinand:
When WDW was built in the 1960s more than 70,000 bass were released and left to
Friday, June 29th–I watched “Paris, Je T’aime” and “Sicko.”
Salarymen go out drinking on average 2.9 times a month, spending about 4,190 yen ($46) each time, a 19 percent decline from a year earlier, according to a Shinsei Financial Co. online survey. That buys five pints of Sapporo Draft at Coopers, a British pub, in central Tokyo.
"Although the law prohibits aliens residing without authorization in the United States from receiving most federal public benefits, an increasing number of these individuals are filing tax returns claiming this refundable credit," Rep. Sam Johnson, R-Texas, said when the House debated the payroll tax cut measure in December. "Illegal immigrants bilked $4.2 billion from the U.S. taxpayers (in 2010). I think that it's time that we fixed it."
"They are also exempted from getting approval to set tuition fees and allowed to enrol foreign students automatically," he said.
The incident - which gained national attention when it was captured on videotape and distributed on YouTube - had prompted the government to sue the men, saying they violated the 1965 Voting Rights Act by scaring would-be voters with the weapon, racial slurs and military-style uniforms.
Sometimes we aim so high that we fail to see what lies before us. Ive aimed for the stars for sure, and tripped over the glorious things in my life that I have neglected or never recognised at all.
I’m sure others can provide some advice on how they get through such periods of living in blehdom, but deep down, this is a personal battle. And I’m going to win it, I Promise – as a minimum – before I have to go back to have the hole in my jaw looked at. And can blow my nose again.
i must stay inside until november
Colin Stanbridge, chief executive of the London Chamber of Commerce and Industry, said: "There will be inevitable pressures on the transport system and it is crucial that all companies are aware of any impact on their own firm. Affected businesses will need to think ahead and should start considering plans as early as possible.
(There's also a great ad pulling together the collections of Brubaker and Phillips' collaborative work, which we'll reprint later.)
A world in which strippers, like comic book super heroes have alter ego’s and supernatural powers.
In other news, I'm plodding along with WALKING IN SHADOW. Today was my first day back at work after a 6 day vacation so I'm struggling to get back into the swing of things. This working/writing business, as most of us know, is TOUGH. It's only Monday and I'm exhausted. :)
When you get old your Saturday's are "different". You have read the story about "The Boss" and me going to Greenville and then on to Denton where we lived when we first got "hitched". Spur of the moment. Well, we do movies that way too. We have breakfast around lunch time, (This week it was at the EGG and I,,maybe I will get a complimentary ticket for that plug) and then we could think of no place to run off to so we decided on a movie. Saturday tickets are at a discount. Six dollars each. That makes twelve dollars for entry fee, but I always outsmart "The Boss". I drop her off at the ticket booth and go park the van. See, that way she is tricked into buying the tickets. I park and we enter the gate and she runs off to the "powder room" while I get refreshments. They are a bargain at our movie house. Two Icee's, a box of Milk Duds and a sack of popcorn only came to twenty two dollars and sixy three cents. Good thing they were out of bottled water, it is only 5.25, but it is a pretty good sized bottle. I wonder who out-smatz who on this deal. reckon?
With hanging tissue paper pom poms, butterflies and stars, sweeping drapes from the ceiling and a great wall 'scene setter' we certainly did set the woodland fairy scene!
And after that rant from Lord Copper, we now return Sloggers everywhere to our coverage of international pro-Am Hackgate sword-diving.
In the first year alone, the note will require an $80,000 principal payment plus $24,000 worth of interest (6% of $400,000). To meet the principal payment alone, the company would need to generate $123,077 in pre-tax earnings in order to net $80,000 after tax. Adding in the $24,000 in interest, the company would need to generate $147,077 in pre-tax earnings in the first year. Given an average net margin of 5%, the company would need to generate $2,941,538 in new sales in order to make the first year’s principal and interest payment to the deceased’s estate. How likely is it for such a small company to generate $2.9 million in new sales in the year following the death of a key employee/shareholder?
I hope I've inspired you to add a little vintage appeal to your projects. You'll be surprised at how easy it can be!
Here is your mission, if you choose to accept it...Well, duh, I have to accept it, it's my idea and I'm not letting myself off the hook... It's a learning experience...I going to have a creating- sewing sprint! Why? Because I over think things. WAY over think them, and it holds me back. I plan and plan and plan: pages, lay outs, ideas, ect and then can't get to them because I run out of time or energy. Then I have to put it all away and start over the next time. (Thus, the awesome craft room that in the works...I won't have to put away, exactly, I can just shut the door and come back and pick up where I left off.) SO, I am having a "sprint" in order to break myself of this annoying habit! Heres the plan, or the rules...Create- put together as many layouts as possible in the allotted time. This doesn't mean completely finished pages, I can adds words or photos or paint later. It means, match up some things, or not...they don't have to match, just put together and ready to be sewn and put into a book...Next rule: sew. Third rule: Do this all in an hour! Really. I've already gathered all the supplies..I'm good at that...I gathered and gathered...now I have have enough for, umm, about fifty pages. At least...I'll set the timer and speed create. You can try it too. Do not pass go, do not collect...any more notions, do not get a drink of water...ok, well maybe one...do not run out of thread, oh shoot, where is that thread? I hope it lasts!...I will say, if someone comes over or calls, or the cat needs to be fed, oh, I already did that, I'm going to turn the timer off. I have to have the whole hour! that I am short on material. Not materialS, cloth. Oh well, whatever I have is what I will use. AND, I will go outside of my own box. Different things, things I haven't tried before or that aren't perfect. Gasp.! Ha! I can do it! You can too!
Cincinnati Reds, 11-11, second place in National League Central Division
M.S: I have a very cordial relationship with those snails who elect to stay far, far away from my garden.
It’s official: our production of Bloody Bloody Andrew Jackson will be hitting the stage this summer. As you guys know, I love it when history is made even more accessible through a good musical, and this show is no exception. Rock heavy and ridiculous, this tongue-in-cheek jaunt through the early 19th century tells the story of the U.S.’s seventh president in an entirely new light.
We almost forgot that April is Confederate History Month, a glorious month in which certain southern states of the Union celebrate that one time 160 years ago when they decided not to be American anymore rather than stop owning black people. It’s like sticking your genitals in a bear trap, having the ripped from your body, and then throwing a party every year proclaiming that you’re going to get new genitals some day and when you do they’re going to right back in that bear trap to show it what’s what. To us fast-talking Yankee bastards, it reminds us to mock the South.
Voice and Empathy
On the news, you never hear about a friend of the family, Uncles, Aunts, or incestuous relationships, that are often only played out in African American movies.
Christians today should beware of working for themselves instead of working for the Lord. Ask the Holy Ghost to give you a spiritual check-up today, to make sure you are free from the sins of rationalization, rationalism, and re-ordered priorities.
9A little leaven leaveneth the whole lump.
Lou will supply a fully functioning pumpkin (the one centre-stage of the picture above.)
“Mrs Fredrickson”
The "everlasting fire" into which the "goats" are cast certainly does sound like a clear formulation of a hellfire doctrine but that impression is partly an effect of a poor translation. The word translated as "punishment" is in Greek "kolasin" and it simply means "cutting off". It is the word a Greek gardener might use to describe the pruning of a tree. So it would be a defensible translation to say that the goats would be cut off and thrown away like the unwanted branch of a tree
Finally, megacorporation Weyland-Yutani has recently acquired a number of lucrative government defense contracts and is seeking advancement in the fields of bioweaponry and energy manipulation in order to fill them. They have no moral or ethical rules regarding the acquisition and development of this technology, which makes them very dangerous.
Hope you are all having a great week. I know many of you have seen the many versions of the Ikea Rast Dresser that are out there already, but if not...check them out! Just Google Ikea Rast Hack and dozens upon dozens show up.
As soon as I read the first few pages, and saw Hanna talking to her father, who wasn't there, I was hooked. This book is just brilliant, and absolutely mental, but in a really good way!
Subsequent to that blog entry we heard from the man behind the project, Alan Goldsmith, and you can read his comments in that blog entry.
so I really could use a break.
So, that's it. I did it. 30 posts in 30 days!
I was wrong, made me feel,
Tomato:1,chopped
Meaning: This color is a symbol of innocence, victims of terrorism, violence against women, peace, right to life, bone cancer, adoptees, and retinal blastoma.
I flew home Christmas Eve morning and flew back the evening of the 28th. Five days at home. It was wonderful :) The boy flew in on the 26th and spent time getting to know my family. We were lazy and bummed around the house. A much needed break from life.
Betsey Johnson tea party dresses. They come in like...every color imaginable. I know some of you might think "Oh God, lace monster!" but in Himegyaru, which has practically proven itself to be the tackiest fashion in the Shibuya region, something like this is a "must have".
In the meantime, the revolution has come to a grinding halt although my inspiration to blog about all things letter writing has returned and so that can only be a good sign. Perhaps this shift in my thinking will somehow impact Canada Post and soon the mail will be travelling again to and from one another.
So in taking these items out of our diet, I'm going to be introducing lots more veggies and fruits and whole grains into our menu.
Vegetables usually take six to 16 hours to dry. Fruits can require up to 48 hours.
And you to you lord of the earth.
This leaves me dependent on the tools and craft of the dentist to fix up the damage. Well, I reckon they're doing a fine job. I still have all my teeth, patched up as they are. I don't think my 18th century counterpart would have been so lucky. Nor my third-world counterpart. The public health service is providing me with the wonderful service of these skilled workers and the benefits of high technological standards, in this case without a ridiculous waiting list to get through, and as a pensioner, I only had to pay a contribution of $25 for today's appointment. I am so thankful for our public health services.
Think back to that monotone professor you had that made you fall asleep, no matter how interesting you found the subject matter. The same can happen in your presentation. If you aren’t excited about what you’re presenting, then your prospects won’t be excited either. Don’t be afraid to use some humor if appropriate for the subject matter. Make sure that overall, your presentation team has a certain spark that will please the potential customers.
For example, you could send the following text message to 70070:
One of the great themes of Occupy Wall Street, of course, is the death of US democracy—the near-total capture of our political system by Wall Street firms and the financial power of the 1%. In the beginning the emphasis was on political corruption, the fact that both parties so beholden to the demands of Wall Street and corporate lobbyists that working within the political system to change anything has become simply meaningless. Recent events have demonstrated just how much deeper the power of money really goes. It is not just the political class. It is the very structure of American government, starting with the law and those who are sworn to enforce it—police officers who, as even this brief illustration makes clear, are directly in the pay of and under the orders of Wall Street executives, and who, as a result, are willing to systematically violate their oaths to protect the public when members of that public have the temerity to make a public issue out of exactly these kind of arrangements.
“Who so loves, believes the impossible.” (Elizabeth Barrett Browning)
½ cup key lime juice
We're so happy you could join us for this super-fun hop showcasing cards, layouts and projects that feature everything to be thankful for!! You'll find an array of ideas throughout the hop -- We hope you'll enjoy each and every project along the way!!
Certain of my characters will be experiencing a full range of heartbeat levels (evil grin.) What have you subjected yours to, recently?
Are we willing to let the terrorists win?
17) The Siren – Graveyard - from “Hisingen Blues”
My most sincerest apologies for not posting since....*gulp*.....June of 2010. I'd make a lot of excuses, but it just boils down to not wanting to write what was in my head. Being lazy. Being busy. The usual.
Jason was rather glum the other week. It was heartbreaking. I wanted to cheer him up in a way which didn't involve me getting naked...and then I received an email from the Nuffnang Product Talk people saying they would be sending us an iron to test and review.
5. “The remembrance of the abundance of Thy sweetness they shall pour forth.” O happy feasts! What shall they eat, who thus shall “pour forth”! …So eat, that thou mayest pour forth again; so receive, that thou mayest give. Thou eatest, when thou learnest; thou pourest forth again, when thou teachest: thou eatest, when thou hearest; thou pourest forth again, when thou preachest; but that thou pourest forth, which thou hast first eaten. Finally, that most eager feaster John, to whom the very table of the Lord sufficed not, unless he leaned on the Lord’s breast, and of his inmost heart drank in divine secrets; what did he pour forth? “In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God.” How is it that it sufficeth not to say, “Thy remembrance;” or, “the remembrance of Thine abundance”? Because, what availeth it if it be abundant, yet not sweet? So also it is annoying if it be sweet but too little.
You can also enter your zip code to find out what makeover, gift with purchase, spa open houses, and sampling events are happening near your home.
It's the hardest thing I've ever done, but it's also the most rewarding.
D.) Russian
Kyle Mills
4 lbs pork loin, cubed
I'm super thrilled/overwhelmed by my busy week, but it means my blog posting this week has been less than exciting. Sorry for that! I'll be back on Friday for my Weekly Gratitude, and then hopefully I can resume with my 30x30 photos on Monday. I swear I'll finish this challenge, even if it takes me to July!
Clad in his Sofia disguise, he tells Mi Roo to hand over the manuscript by text. Umm, can’t Mi Roo tell that “Sofia” has man hands? I can hear Jerry Seinfeld going, ‘Man hands!! She had man hands!’ She plops it on the table in front of him and confesses that she had no intention of releasing it on the internet. She just needed the leverage so she could meet Sofia again. Mi Roo goes on about how she got started writing the column and how it affected her and her life. At the same time, Joon can’t seem to concentrate. His hands are itching to reach for the manuscript and make a run for it again.
I picked him up the other day and he was ready, face washed, hair combed to within an inch of its life and ready for his new school - or at least as ready as any school boy ever is for anything to do with school!
Once it is made clear that this order is binding and enforceable on BOTH Parents, should they wish to return matters to Court it will have to be at the individuals’ own expense as no future Legal Aid will be available and this should focus minds by all concerned to get it right first time.
These early Massive Attack singles have lost little of their power to raise the hairs on the back of my neck.
This class ended too soon, long before we could see all of her photos of some really excellent landscapes. (To my knowledge, this was the first time I ever had a class at the MAHSC taught by a champion triathlete.)
Oath – I will read another book this month. I have two books at the moment to choose from, and I think my leetle brother is going to download some e-novels in my computer over the weekend so I may have a whole new book in mind to read. But I would like to keep up with my trend here not only because I love to read (forget calgon taking you away, a book is so much more effective!) but also I think it’s important to keep your mind busy, and books do that rather well.
Today is slightly better, but I'm still ready to rip the stuffing out of a Raggedy Ann doll.
I did get a strong warning about my next weigh-in, and the consequences of 3 gains in a row. I have been exercising, even twice yesterday....so here's hoping the diet gods are listening!
Participating Western MA parks include:
Traditional boudoir photography revolves around a woman's bedroom... soft lighting and sheer lingerie... a little tease... Male boudoir photography is whatever you want it to be - unapologetically confident and sexy photos of you.
Anyway, I am fortunate enough to not have to struggle to put food on my table at Thanksgiving but I know there are so many that are. And while I wish that I could help everyone, I can't.....but Jill over at Scary Mommy did. And I read her post and "immediately said What can I do to help".
God has given me eternal life, and this life has its source in His Son Jesus Christ. Whoever has the Son has this life; whoever does not have the Son of God does not have life! Amen!
Seminole County Sheriff Don Eslinger is in Tallahassee fighting the bill, which he calls an invitation for more crime with guns. The bill is drawing fire from the Florida Sheriff’s Association.
9:00-10:50 Panel 2: Annette Hamilton, Bophana, Patrick Campos, Eric Galmard
I chose to use this sweet little thing and inked her up with my copics marker, plus a little paper piecing!
“You are so grounded when you get home, girly-boy.”
Often the preferred term for a person from — or whose ancestors were from — a Spanish-speaking land or culture or from Latin America. Latina is the feminine form. Follow the person’s preference. Use a more specific identification when possible, such as Cuban, Puerto Rican, Brazilian or Mexican-American. See Hispanic, nationalities and races, and race entries.
For Your Entertainment – Adam Lambert
Yesterday I realized something. In all of the chaos of last week I forgot to register Tyler for school.
That last one is my favorite! I’m sure since Tim Tebow was drafted one of my least favorite football teams – Denver Broncos – I will come up with plenty more things to do with Tebow’s tears! It’s a challenge I look forward to taking on!
Started to come to life
If your short story is between 3000 and 7500 words and fits into the genre of YA historical romance we want to read it. The story can include steampunk, fantasy, or adventure, as long as it includes some historical elements then we are interested in reading it.
Off the top of my head, Ted Kennedy’s legacy consists of:
Brooklyn's Winter Ale came my way via Stephen of The Beer Club. Much as I'm a huge fan of Brooklyn Lager, I've not been all that enamoured by anything (much) else they've produced. This one pours thickly, a chestnut red, topped by a reluctant head. Oddly, despite, the heavy texture, there's quite a lot of fizz. The taste is pleasant, however: predominantly sweet, I get lots of chewy toffee livened just slightly by top notes of milk chocolate, brown sugar and raisins. At 6.1% ABV I think it meets its specification as a warming winter ale quite well.
Griffin examines how people who don’t consider themselves to be racist do in fact show themselves to be exactly that in their speech and mannerisms, although in the interest of fairness and truth, he also details incidents of kindness and kinship shown to him by both black and white people.
I decided a while back that I wanted to make a big Christmas beer to hand out to friends and family during the holidays, I just wasn't sure what style I wanted to brew. At first I considered brewing up one of those ambiguous “winter warmers” that almost every craft brewer seems to put out this time of year, then I remembered that I don't even really like very many of them. Then I read about this french saison yeast the Wyeast had released as part of their “Private Collection” special release program. It's a french saison yeast, rumored to be from Brasserie Thiriez, that doesn't need ridiculously high fermentation temperatures like their regular saison yeast. Bingo, I quickly decided, after consulting Farmhouse Ales, that the beer I would brew would be a Bier de Noel, basically a dark, high gravity saison. The recipe was based off the info in the book.
Use it, or pay a MU if one is available in town.
"The War Wagon" - 1967
(Note: You need to buy minecraft the link is at the bottom of the page. Minecraft is owned my mojang)
Anyway, I was selected to take a picture of the man clan as two men had to bolt.
It's illustration Inception!
The statistics show a shot count of 11-3 in City’s favour, demonstrating both the lack of chances throughout the game, and United’s inability to trouble City at all, and the whole country must be rejoicing that, for the time being at least, justice has been done.
IBUs: 45
Dale
teeheehee… separated at birth??
Search engine keywords to target: transition guidelines, gender identity, gender expression, transgender, transsexual, cross dress, gender reassignment, sex reassignment, sex change*, transgendered* (* these are not preferred terminology, but are intended to capture potential searches)
In the 6th stitch from the seam, attach yarn and ch 2.
Alet notes that the two factions amongst the Afrikaners use two very different approaches to survive each day: One group demands that all the donations of food and cash go to their leader Irene Abbott (sister of the boxer) and her partner; the other group headed by ‘Willem’ is approaching their grinding povery in the communal-Christian way: teaming up and sharing their cash earned each day and sharing their food – women sew items to sell such as t-shirts and ragdolls; the men go out to earn cash with odd jobs each day and to sell homemade items – and with the cash buy food to share out amongs them all. This group – denied access to the only electricity-point by the Abbott clan - cook their food in an open communal kitchen and hold prayer meetings each morning to give them courage for the day ahead. They made a home-made boiler called a ‘donkie’ (below) to boil their water on. And they’ve scrounged some old-electricity generators which one skilled mechanic keeps running each day.
3. Careful With That Axe, Eugene 11:56
It's worth noting the two 12" records here have an extra song the 7"s omit. Both End of a Dream, and Moscow Motion are great Positive Noise tracks. Ditto for Love Like Property, and Give Me Passion. All are similar in style to Heart of Darkness. Both Ghosts, and ...And Yet Again were on the LP, the latter being the only early Positive Noise song I don't have much love for. Charm finds them trying on some more danceable sounds, with a horn section. Pretty cool, but it's not really my thing. I also included in the 7" edited version of Charm, and Give Me Passion from the 7", because it's a slightly better rip.
He dialed as quickly as he could
But then I remembered that he had a good solid minute at the doctor's office today when he didn't cry. When he chewed happily on his monkey rattle.
Pashki I decided would be Ancient Egyptian in origin (as cats were a sacred animal in that culture), so I did a fair bit of research there. The name takes ‘pash’ from the cat goddess Pasht or Bast and ‘ki’ from the word meaning ‘spiritual power’ or ‘life force’ in many cultures. In fact, in Ancient Egyptian this word is actually ‘ka’, but I presumed a certain evolution of the word over time. And pashki just sounded better.
Perfect. See...this preschool thing is TOTALLY paying off! I just hope next week's topic is:
"English sailors were being piped over their ship's side, and on board the enemy's. Like rats the St Philip's crew began to bolt from her on every side. They had run her aground, and fire had broken out. At the peal of a trumpet, the English cut the anchor ropes of all the four great Apostolic galleons; they began to heel over on the mudbank, and from the St Philip there came 'tumbling into the sea heaps of soldiers, so thick as if coals had been poured out of a sack ... some drowned and some sticking in the mud.... The spectacle was very lamentable, for many drowned themselves; many, half burnt, leapt into the water; very many hanging by the ropes' ends by the ships sides, under the water even to the lips; many swimming with grievous wounds, stricken under water and put out of their pain; and withal so huge a fire and such tearing of ordnance in the great Philip and the rest, when the fire came to them as, if any man had a desire to see Hell itself, it was there most lively figured. Ourselves spared the lives of all, after the victory; but the Flemings, who did little or nothing in the fight, used merciless slaughter, till they were by myself, and afterward by my Lord Admiral, beaten off."
(ps - the tumblr site I have had for a while,
Further on, we find an enchanted forest of towering white pine. Catch a view of Lake Superior, discover an old cabin in the woods.
thank you for your listening.
Holiday- Christmas
This blog is about to show readers anything and everything happening in the dance scene here at Cal Poly and in San Luis Obispo. Written by a local, eager to get more involved in the dance community, it will provide firsthand experience in the dance world. Ready to show readers what it is like dancing as a student at Cal Poly, where the next best show is, or where to find the most exciting classes, this blog’s possibilities are endless. Anyone who shares a passion for dance, from the dancers themselves to the admiring audience member, this blog is written for you. Inspired by a need to dance and the want to share it with the world, let the writing begin.
She turned. She felt her stomach heaving a barely audible cry out of her throat. He walked in front of her, barely daring to hold her shoulders while facing her. She looked up, squaring her shoulders. She laughed.
ring, Bettie Page bangs, two sparrows inked
Such was ATT’s unpopularity when the coup occurred that few Malians have risen up or spoken up to defend him or the institutions the coup overturned. The issue now, for most Malians, is not whether he should be reinstated, but how best to legitimize his departure, most likely through his resignation (once his whereabouts are known). Given the lack of public outcry here against the putsch, it is hard to believe that crowds would mobilize in Bamako to demand ATT’s return; on the contrary, at a time when Malians perceive unprecedented threats to their nation, his reputation for ineffectiveness could mobilize crowds to oppose any such move.
When Suze Orman grew up on the rough-and-tumble South Side of Chicago, she drew strength from a family credo: “An Orman never gives up.”
I have another requested post to share with all off you tonight. The lovely Linny from schmuckstueck asked me if I could share swatches off the NYX Powder Blush in Angel. I decided to do a review and share my opinion on this lovely blush with all off you :)
04 Georgia on My Mind (Carmichael, Gorrell) 6:41
Let the fun begin!!!
For a refreshing change, I’d like to learn about the country I’m visiting before I even get there.
For my first WW recipe post, decided to try out a crock-pot recipe. I am not a big fan of crock pot recipes (I often find the chicken is a bit too cooked/dry to my taste!), but this chili was AMAZING!! We LOVED it!!! :)
If you see the ring/square/sawtooth combination, you can most certainly expect within usually 2 days or less …. TORNADOES at (or very close to 50 miles or less) the epicenter of each signature.
Director: Larry Charles
No, you did not just have a small stroke. Me. The league is short on coaches so... yeah. I know. You're processing. Me too. It's a lot of information. Sit down. Get a drink if you need to. I certainly did.
November 3, 1853
I cannot believe we only have 10 weeks to go. Seriously. Cannot. Believe.
The strictness of the enforcement of this rule differs from restaurant to restaurant. I’ve been in some restaurants were the server has barely spoken let alone smiled and I’ve been to others where they smiled so much I became suspicious and in the end I left after asking for directions to somewhere I wasn’t going to.
In my previous post is a photo of 3 Plane trees.
I mentioned it above, but I want to say it again: with attractions such as the ones just listed, energetic school children and enthusiastic tourists would have a totally authentic immersive feel of Pompeii. They will then understand more about the actual remains when they see them. IF they see them. If they are happy with their ersatz experience, there is no need for them to drag around the real ruins. After a fun but exhausting day at replica Pompeii, only the keenest will want to visit the real site. And I think that is OK.
The Conspiracy
I’m to start over again (the answer for yesterday’s post) & now I’m picking up pieces after the explosive post 2 days ago.
FACT: Geoffrey Beevers is credited as the Melkur to conceal the plot twist of the Master’s return, and the name Tremas is also an anagram of Master.
weighty, but easily forgotten.
To Enter:All you need to do is visit The Wedding Outlet and find the accessory that you believe completes this inspiration board. Leave a comment right here with a link to the accessory you would choose along with a valid e-mail address so we can reach you if you win. Deadline is September 21 at midnight CST. The lucky winner will be announced on September 22. Good luck!
· $2,305 on pet care
The teams that Pat has coached have been phenomenal and she brought top quality teams to the court every year. Coaches from all of women’s college basketball and even men’s too, have to acknowledge how great of a coach she is.
This astonished me. If you look at Scorsese's The Last Waltz, not only is Robertson portrayed as The Band's leader, he's seen as their most valuable mouthpiece as well, both in interviews and on stage. I mean, he looks like he's belting it away during that film. But, sitting here with Levon, I learned that this was the basis for the schism in the band. Levon had enough good will to provide some memorable moments for Scorsese, but he told us he hated doing the movie, because he felt it supported the notion that the duplicitous Robertson was the center of The Band. "If anyone was the center, it was Garth Hudson. He was our music teacher, and he was the one that took us on up."
Apart from the four shares, they will also receive the following
“It is a matter of sharing and bearing the pain and puzzlement of the world so that the crucified love of God in Christ may be brought to bear healingly upon the world at exactly that point.
(For Peter Halter): Sir, explain yourself.
While some have bashed the film for following in the New Year’s Eve/Valentine’s Day fashion, there is one aspect that sets this film apart and that is the talent both behind and in front of the camera. Director Kirk Jones (Waking Ned Devine, Nanny McPhee) has displayed his knack for innovative humor then when you combine that with screenwriter Shauna Cross (Whip It) you can be rest assured that they will put this all-star cast to good use. This film may not break any records, however it is sure to use its star power to bring in fans looking for a few laughs in this predominately action-packed summer. While the trailer may not be as funny as one would expect, I still have high hopes that this film will be a hit.
This beer will be the second in the Brewer's Pride series from Spoetzl, the first being their Shiner Old-Time Alt. Both are sold bundled in their "Family Reunion" multi-packs, and should be available by December.
tilting my chin skywards,
Before Wood boarded the yacht, she met with Rebecca and confronted her with the photographic evidence from her hired private eye. Rebecca broke down and admitted the affair and sobbed trying to tell Natalie she was sorry. Natalie wasn’t buying any of this. She tied up Rebecca, forced alcohol down her throat, then took her out to sea. With Rebecca unconscious, Wood pushed her overboard. She was found by the coast guard the next day.
Not my thing but Trey-J liked it and blew her budget up.
She is still because she believes it will be over quicker that way. She may feel soiled and hurt for a day or two but then it will pass and she will forget. She’s been with men who left her unmoved. This is the same for her. It’ll pass.
Something in your heart will flutter.
Gospel of Luke
been doing a bit of modeling)
You better do it on a jog or a really good clip.
A lovely weekend with my daughter and extended family in Paris left me feeling rather more sanguine about things generally; that and that fact that a job application on Friday solicited a phone call an hour later with an invitation to interview that afternoon. I was not able to go, but the chap asked would I be interested in other vacancies coming up soon, and he emailed me shortly after saying he would contact me again.
"Between 1990 and 1994, the ruling apartheid government waged a secret war against Nelson Mandela's ANC party and its supporters. In this covert war the government found a powerful ally in Inkatha's movement and its thousands of Zulu warriors."
The human brain is perhaps the most complex system on the planet today. And while many of its basic support structures are centralized, the part of the brain that does the ‘thinking,’ known as the ‘neocortex,’ is radically distributed. In fact, it’s organized in a manner not unlike ‘Occupy Wall Street.’ According to artificial intelligence researcher Jeff Hawkins, what the neocortex does is perhaps best described as ‘memory prediction.’ One part of the brain tries to predict what another part is going to ‘say next,’ and those connected to the outside world try to predict what sensory organs are going to ‘say next’ (often described in the more technical language of (re)efference/afference copies, for more see, for example, The Quest for Consciousness, by Christoff Koch). When these mini-agents disagree, they examine the situation more closely, and when they agree, they pass on their findings to others. Decentralized voting ripples through ever larger parts of the brain, recruiting ever larger groups to come to a consensus. It’s for this reason that many researchers have called this a ‘recruitment’ model of the mind.
“Dance?”, Young whispered in my ears. “I can’t really.”, I whispered back and noticed I fell only around a feet shorter to him in my extra high heels.
Originality, variety and imagination.
Strung out my emotions, like some
It will be interesting to see what happens to France now that the UMP is out of power. Even before the election, there were already a few voices in the UMP calling for some kind of arrangement with the Front National. Those voices will only be strengthened now. Indeed, the UMP, itself a coalition of formally separate factions, may well disintegrate, leading to some kind of new constellation on the right.
I felt in the mood for some digital scrapbooking this morning and used photos from my garden. This is a new plant this year called Francoa Sonchifolia - more commonly known as 'Bridal Wreath'. Very pretty and delicate....
Really the only thing he would do reliably was chase that tennis ball. And I didn't teach him that. That was pure instinct.
5. The only "video game" I can win at is Pac-Man, but I can also play a good game of air hockey!
WELCOME TO PARADISE, OHIO,
"Why are our cups made of wood?" I ask her in Latin.
Ideally the appointed candidate will work full time (37 hours per week), based in our offices in Malvern, Worcestershire. However, for the right candidate we may consider a job-share (18.5 hours) appointment and/or some limited home-working provision.
Daily News, ‘”Lankan asylum-seekers bound for Australia,” 22 Oct. 2010.
The best thing about being sans work is the free time I have to visit with friends, and it's because of this free time that I can hop in the car and travel three hours across the province to the thriving metropolis that is Napanee, Ontario. So what's captured my attention to justify a fill-up of the tank and a Tim Horton's travel mug in my hand? My Japanese friends on the last leg of their Canadian visit.
So then I punish myself.
Apparently he continues to reside in Montana, keeping a low profile and complying with the requirements that he not represent himself as a priest in public. The lawsuit has not been withdrawn, though no action has been publicly announced. The various Facebook pages that rose up to support or criticize him have dwindled to a few members each, issuing regular shots at one another but providing no light.
Example: We have a group of settings to change the sounds associated with the alerts that the application shows. So, by changing a group of sounds in the settings, the user Innocently invokes a method call on the settings manager that could be something like:
I moved stuff out, threw/gave stuff away and spent months re-organising the house.
OK - So day 2 of my trip to CHA went like this...I briefly woke up at about 3 in the morning with full light peering through my curtains...I thought it was sunlight - but it was really all the happy lights on buildings that surround the LA Live area! Once I figured that out - I joyfully went back to sleep for a while.
The location of the shop is very good, in the Ground Floor, the first store beside the entrance and opposite Starbucks.
Head: Peter Sawchuk
Only mine weren't $55.99 each. They weren't even $20.00 each. Mine were.... drumroll please.... $37.98 for TWO. $18.99 a piece for base and lamp shade. Can I get an amen? I found 2 left at Ross and scooped them up so fast. As I was checking out a lot of ladies were all "oh I love those lamps!" "I want those lamps!" and I just laughed because they were mine. both of them. mine. no mah left fo you. Love that rush!
We thank you for your prompt attention to this important matter, and we patiently await your decisions regarding the appointments.
Food Tip #2: Make sure to puree each food separately…babies like individual tastes at first…too many combos can be confusing and unsatisfying!
The distinguished historian Paul Johnson believes that Diana's empathy was a unique gift. "...She had something that very few people possess. She had extraordinary intuition and could see people who were nice and warm to them and sympathize with them...Very few people compare to what she had."
Use the coupon code AB4 at checkout for free shipping on your
#28... Crafty Emma
I picked up these plain CHIPBOARD alphabets from Kaisercraft from SCRAPBOOK STAR. They come in all shapes and sizes, UPPER CASE to use as nice BIG stand out initials and smaller one word titles and, and LOWERCASE to use in all circumstances.
Why is the Church described as apostolic?
1/4 cup cold whole milk
Do you keep a travel journal? Is it online or off? Tell me about it in the comments!
6. I looked up the word BEAUTIFUL in the thesaurus taday, and your name was included.
It’s been a while since I wrote my last blog post because I’ve been busy with life and work in general. I have had the best start to my new year already with some additional qualifications and certifications to add to my CV.
Different paths.
When this now historic comic appeared fifty years ago it looked great, it was an example of the wonders of commercial printing. In those days the artist would send in their artwork usually on board and it would be photographed and the transparencies would be the source of the plates used to print his artwork using four runs (sometimes more) which would print a sequence of dots in 1). Cyan 2). Magenta 3). Yellow and 4). Black. By the time Commando number four was printed the whole process was pretty refined and misalignments creating out of register prints were the exception rather than the rule.
unitedhub.com boarding zones
Sky is in mourning for a white buffalo.
"I am going to fuck your little ass," he answered.
so many other things going on.
We woke up both knackered and nervous, knackered because we were up past midnight the previous evening practising as 47th Ballybrack Gospel choir and nervous because we had to perform ten songs at the church service that day. The service was in Living Hope Primary School. We arrived at the school at ten and for the first time ever there were no groups of kids running towards the bus cheering our arrival.
It's being poked and prodded, and giving up blood, and urine. Tests that hurt, tests that are embarrassing, tests that are scary.
Good luck and thank you again for making this whole thing so much fun!!
But conscience must ask the question, “Is it right?”
Karmanyeva adhikarasthe – You only have the right to right action (adapting your technique to change around you)
Because I am a Christian, God's grace and will are something I think of just about every second of every day when it comes to Murphy's cancer. We pray for one yet know so little of the other. How can we presume then to speak for those who cannot speak for themselves?
In Atlanta, Delta Airlines said it is already licensed to operate charter flights to Cuba. In Fort Lauderdale, Airline Broker Co., which also has a license, is vying to offer twice-weekly flights. Other airports that have expressed interest in offering Cuba flights are Dallas/Fort Worth, New Orleans, Chicago, San Juan, Pittsburgh, and Baltimore.
- She also says "good job" to us. She will ask me to draw something and when I do she will say, "good job mom." (Even if it was a terrible drawing.) She does this for lots of things like singing a song or playing a song on the piano, or kicking a ball, or making her some food item.
dribbles, mouse poop
They sent me a pair of circle lenses of my choice which was very kind of them. I figured this would be the best opportunity to try out some pink lenses. This time I picked out the Japan Barbie Eye Super Nudy (16 diameter)
If you are looking for brilliant white walls, this is your paint -
WHAT IS POLICE WEEK????
As Shannon is talking to the officers, a van comes rolling up to the location. As it passes by, it slows down to see if the woman the police are talking to is Shannon. Confident that it is, it comes to a stop and the side door opens up with armed individuals coming out. Seeing this unfold, Shannon realizes what’s going to happen, so she turns on her heals and begins to run. Before the officers have a chance to process what is going on, the members from the New World Power open fire, taking down both officers. One officer will die on the scene while the other has a chance of survival if medical assistance arrives on time.
"Nothing on the materials provided says whether this object came to me from Sahara Knax and the Alchemites, but I am not a believer in the Alchemite cult," writes Rumplestiltskin, who added that some of the plastic is being burned in a home-built generator to provide power for their effort to clean the ocean.
And so Jami waits as her heart is transformed and her understanding of her Maker and Redeemer matures. I can remember times when I knew about others' pain - miscarriage, a still born baby, a cancer diagnosis, and on and on and on - and I remained silent. Not wanting to say the wrong thing, I said nothing at all. I grieve now over my cowardliness. I'm embarrassed of my fear of stumbling upon my words and appearing foolish -- ashamed of my selfishness.
While some of the residents have been given compensation, it is estimated that a lot more have not received theirs.
If you need a little more inspiration just take a look at the stunning creations my fab Design Team have created!.
910-977-1055
Alexander's mother was a Russian, from the St Petersburg aristocracy. He was baptised into the Russian Orthodox Church and spent his childhood partly in the Caucasus (with forays into Azerbaijan and Chechnya) and partly in Ukraine, where a series of French and English governesses educated him and his sisters at home.
Hands that shed innocent blood,
Presumably delta is not small. So it comes with considerable risk and cost implications – let alone the damage already done to our democratic processes which is implicit in sticking big pointy things on top of council blocks without planning permission.
Level 20: MP Cost: 15, 100% chance to cancel the enemy’s buffs, Time between skills: 20 seconds.
In March, 1970, Judge James Parsons ruled that "sex is not a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of the business of tending bar in the City of Chicago." The barmaid ordinance was dead, but it had stood for nearly 20 years.
Man was made to live in community. In Genesis 2, we’re told it’s not good for man to be alone. And in a classical world the worst punishment was to be banished from society, because you had no meaning once you were.
So. If you were worried about me, thanks. I think we might make it. I just can’t promise I won’t be posting I-HATE-PUPPIES updates intermittently when she finds new ways to annoy me. For now, she’s not such a handful as I first thought.
Woman, spread your legs when you're told.
To be included in the Cricut Imagine Users Group draw for six (6) winners of a free copy of my Cricut Screens and six (6) winners of a free copy of my Gypsy screens, be sure you have:
Abby's stomach flipped. She bit the side of her tongue to keep herself from begging him to stay.
“The appearance of conflict is as dangerous to public confidence in the administration of justice as true conflict itself. Justice must not only be done; justice must also be seen to be done.” –Lloyd Cutler, 1981
What does the skyline look like from them?
-Switch to energy-efficient lighting
Ours was great but not quite long enough. Started brainstorming about the decorating projects, went to a bachelorette party, spent time with family and then before I knew it, it was time to wake up this morning and head on out the door.
Antonio Citterio
Part of my time overseas was spent at what was probably the second largest healthcare conference in the world run by our Boston-based partners, the Institute for Healthcare Improvement (IHI). It was a valuable trip and I’m keen to share some of the highlights with you.
Her mother had a brain tumour only a few months before all this happened.
What he doesn't realize is that firearms protect us from grizzlys.
I tell you, nothing beats the aroma of an apple pie baking in the oven on a cold winter evening. And when I pulled it out of the oven, I felt as though I was pulling it straight out of the 50’s. I’m sure the frilly red Christmas apron I was donning may have had something to do with that, too.
The ad industry grew up, the marketing industry grew up, our creative people grew up, and our clients grew up. We came to understand that advertising's power was limited and contingent. We came to understand that a lot of advertising was wasteful and inefficient. We learned that television was not a miracle and advertising was not magic.
Would I be good enough?
Bhishma in Vishnu Sahasranamam tells us that Vishnu is the lord of the past, present and future. (bhUta bhavya bhavan nAthah). What does this mean? What is the past, present and future? And what does it mean to be Lord of such past, present and future. We shall explore these ideas gradually one by one.
· Andy Williams
Miss you blog and blogees, hope you're all well.
She had fallen asleep a whopping 30 minutes before the crew came to shoot so she got to wake up to complete strangers checking out her room. She did excellent - woke up happy and willing to please. I suppose it didn't hurt that grandma was there to talk to her and bribe her with gum...
Game Bat Combo
I splatter painted some white shimmer cardstock using red acrylic paint. The squares on the middle strip are small mirrors :) Very tricky to photograph without seeing me peeking down with the camera in the reflection!!
Naomi xxx
Look back at the list of great sequels (in my opinion) from earlier—Lethal Weapon, Shanghai Knights, The Mummy Returns, Karate Kid Part II, The Last Crusade —in each circumstance, the central enjoyment of the film is not, primarily, action (although each film has action aplenty), rather it is the characters within the film. The Lethal Weapon movies are character showcases, and one watches those films not because of their plot or story, but because one enjoys watching Riggs, Murtaugh and their (increasing!) gang get into and out of trouble together. Shanghai Knights builds on the great chemistry between Jackie Chan and Owen Wilson to create an extension of their story together. The Mummy Returns focuses on the marriage and relationship between Brendan Fraser and Rachel Weisz, and we enjoy the movie (I believe) because of this relational foundation, and not the return of the Mummy. The Karate Kid II builds superbly on the characters of the original, because what people want in a Karate Kid sequel is not more karate, but more of Miyagi’s aphoristic wisdom instructing Daniel-san in how to be mature. Finally, The Last Crusade’s success and appeal stem from the on-screen relationship between Indiana and his father. Their relationship drives the story, renders it compelling, and gives it texture. In each circumstance, the heart of the original film is rarified, developed, and expanded in the sequels. Ultimately, you care about the characters.
19. i have a longing to belong. the need for community. but it is also the core of one of my deepest inner conflicts. the need to belong and the need to not belong. i often feel like i can't handle the belonging. that i don't have enough of me to go around...so i'm often happiest when my "community" is very very tiny. if it tries to get bigger i tend to freak out. and then the longing comes back...it is a terrible cycle, round and round i go...wanting and not wanting, needing and not needing.
Genre: Young Adult
Some of you may be saying, "Tone what down? You're pretty tame."
Jawdat arrived in Niceville four months ago as part of the Youth Exchange and Study Program (YES) through AYUSA Global Youth Exchange. The incident that got him sent home occurred in early November inside an art classroom at the high school.
In their time together (1883-1900) Teddy becomes more manipulative and “political,” Scottie matures -- and the nation grows too, becoming a world power.
*What the predator is assessing is whether or not you are aware of your surroundings at all times and are you a confident person, head down is usually a sign of a person lacking self esteem*
I had my dream job. I was a teacher for 5 years. I miss it sometimes, but not the headaches it caused. Now I'm learning to create my dream job. I'd really, really love to become a professional blogger and get paid for it. I'm working toward that now.
That led to a trip to the dollar store to buy a thermal insole and
Bedtime routine
By the way: Anyone that likes good brew is invited (if you're in the Kansas City area). Show up around noon. I'll be well underway, by then. You can bring some munchies or food, if you're so inclined. And dress warmly. On tap, I'll have a fresh Robust Porter, a 4-y.o. Barleywine, a fairly new Barleywine, a Belgian Farmhouse Ale, and a Oak-aged Imperial Stout; maybe more!
10 Dreams 07:27
1 Spurs vs. 8 Jazz, Jazz win series 4-2.
unless you're in your work cubicle or something,
where's your favorite place to go?
Here's the inside of the bag. There are four large pockets plus a little cell phone pocket. In my opinion, this bag would be the PERFECT gym bag. My yoga mat fits perfectly and even my enormous tennis shoes fit snugly in the bottom of the bag. All the pockets will allow your iPod, Kindle and phone to remain separated from a water bottle, keys or anything else that might damage them. Another A+ pattern from Amy Butler...assuming your brain isn't taking an afternoon siesta.
My theory is this: I believe that many males reach a point in their early/mid twenties that is a hypothetical crossroad in their life, a point where they can choose to grow up and take responsibility or or continue acting without thought of their consequences.
‘In their own guidance the EA recommends that permit holders carry out an internal audit every year.’
Or maybe they would insist on some contemporary fairy tales, and we would be confronted by little Sayyid and his designer suicide belt, the enchanting Isha with the burka that doubled as a time machine, and brave Julius who sang a special song to make all the naughty white people disappear.
~ Craft and sewing goods for moments of wild creative abandon
21 House of Blues, San Diego, CA
How many tragedies/problems/trials have I found myself in, flailing to get out and pleading with God to remove from my life. Then, as time goes by I can see that I came out of the trial better than before. The sorrow was a gift. The pain was not wasted. It had a purpose.
Hyphenation support
I will be studying this conversation for a while, as it has some great information. One of my favorite points that Sye made, that even stood me up was when Justin, as an Atheist, wanted to point to things in the Bible for some of his justifications for his reasoning.
And hey, how is it that the whole whoever-gets-to-pull-out-the-hammer contest is so much like King Arthur and the sword he needed to pull out? :p
Dave Brock, Slash from Guns ‘N Roses, and Lars Ulrich of
Doctor imagining all the things I here
It has been cloudy all day. I was 40º above at noon.
Phew, this stuff is hard work !
From 5-8PM, you will have the opportunity to shop for yourself while giving back to the Children's TLC community. 5% of the proceeds from the evening will go to the Duck Derby, and you also have the first chance to buy ducks for the Derby. Shoppers who spend $250 or more will also get 2 complimentary passes to Schlitterbahn for the Summer 2012 season.
She believes in me like she believes her bible,
If we believe God does not exist, or perceive Him as having abandoned us, then Munch is absolutely correct — to scream is not just the best remedy for our frustrations, but the only remedy. A tragedy greater than that which makes us scream is having no one to hear us scream. Thankfully, our screams do not go unnoticed. God exists, and He cares. When we cry out to Him, He listens. He weaves our troubles into the magnificent tapestry of His plan. He is our comforter when we can do little else but shriek in terrific terror.
Jam (optional)
Drifting in shallows, last year's lily pads hunkered like ghost flowers below the surface, brown and mucky. A single fish leapt and skittered across the water in front of me. Salmon? Trout? Bass? All is mystery beneath my boat.
Book: The Postmistress - Sarah Blake; Tea: Taz - Vanilla Rooibos; Hand knitted pink and white striped mug mat: wonderful gifts from Pondside.
And my mum rang me after the broadcast to tell me how much she'd enjoyed it. Which was a result."
This guy really isn’t a lost cause and could become the display piece that I had originally intended. At the time, my plan had been to use some model cement to glue the parts together but apparently no one builds models anymore as none of the stores nearby had any. He was put to the side until I could make a trip to a hobby store. At some point he made it into a box that was destined for the crap closet.
Territorial Enterprise, October 29, 1863
Translucent elements where the background shows through
Alzheimer’s Disease
My jaw was hanging open by this point and I was having flashbacks, for fairly obvious reasons, to Pearl Harbor (the movie, not the… oh, you figured that out). Ten minutes into that movie I was praying for the Japanese to arrive and start bombing, and ten minutes into this one I was impatiently awaiting the alien invasion.
Judging these musical folk are former Boyz II Men falsetto Shawn Stockman--who's largely useless, aka The Randy, Pussycat Dolls (former?) member Nicole Scherzinger (need I say she's the Paula? Slightly more coherent though), and one of my personal musical heroes, the incomparable Ben Folds (who unlike Simon isn't an asshole with man boobs, but who like Simon gives good, helpful critiques).
8. Click “Run a Report,” then adjust the number of generations and categories you wish to search and then press “Request this Report” and voilà!
As John Lobbock said: “What we see depends on what we look for.” In fact, this is true. Psychologists call it selective perception. Since there is so much stimuli coming at us we choose what we hear and see to suit our needs. Just as a photographer uses various lenses to show “reality” in different ways, we each have a set of filters — experience, culture, economic status, mental and physical health, etc. — through which we see the world. Therefore, if life constantly looks dismal to you, it could be your perspective.
“Yes. You want to do it, or you want me to?”
The mail that gets opened?
I'm thinking that the panties and Magnesium might come in handy for particularly stressful days at work period, headache or no... (just sayin').
“That doesn’t help at all. I don’t know what to think.”
Once again the Argentine artist ‘Antrim’, returns back with a super techy track ‘Dunkle’, charged by full of energy with his characteristic solid beats and atmospheres of suspense, it takes us to mental and surreal labyrinths. Strong bass-lines with psychedelic enviroments, brings emotional dreamlike musical landscape to new dimensions.
*Sigh*. Having 'too much' time on your hands could be disastrous. Especially when you know that those are only borrowed time. That is exactly what is going on with me now. I am on the 4 weeks of medical leave that I, at first, welcomed. The welcome wears out after barely a week. Each time I curl up on the settee with a good book, comes the nagging feeling that I am neglecting my work. And yet I can't bring myself to start working from home. Instead, I spend time reading through favourite blogs.
Chocolate frogs and chocolate peanut butter frogs
Today marks the start of the Easter break for the wee one and moi! 2 glorious weeks of no school or work! Been waiting for it. What am I gonna do... catch up on classes, sell off physical stash and scrap like crazy! TTFN!
Once it has doubled in size place in the middle shelf of an oven pre heated at 190C and bake for 18 to 20 minutes.
Spring water from Welpman Spring in Morgan County, MO.
To wrap this whole thing up would be to mention the I-Con Dealers Room. It felt a lot smaller this year but there is really nothing I can do about that persay but they did still have some treasures worth finding. A lot of steampunk this year and as a fan and a hopeful to join th emovement I really love the Steampunk stuff. I must admit and wish I had more time and money and more reason to own and wear it. I should check out the SteamPunk World’s Fair that was recommended to me but I can another day. Cute little shops littered the Arena floor. Amonst my favorites were Kuriosier and Kuriosier. A cute little dealer who has nothing on her website sadly but made the most intricate designs on Antique keys. Had I the money and something useful to do with them I would have gotten a few. As a necklace it would have probably been a bit much, unless I really embace SteamPunk in which case I am all for it. But in a day to day life I will have to pass.
I should read more books, again.
End result – Good customer base.
She believes this year, but she has seen a lot of holes in the whole theory.
Freedom of expression consists of the rights to freedom of speech, press, assembly and to petition the government for a redress of grievances, and the implied rights of association and belief. The Supreme Court interprets the extent of the protection afforded to these rights. The First Amendment has been interpreted by the Court as applying to the entire federal government even though it is only expressly applicable to Congress. Furthermore, the Court has interpreted, the due process clause of the Fourteenth Amendment as
Presently, the crucifixion of Jesus Christ is observed on a Friday, called Good Friday, and His tomb was found empty on Sunday morning, called Easter. This is not correct based on an analysis at http://aristean.org/wp091.htm titled “Was Jesus crucified on a Friday?”
c/o R.S.V.P. Rental Services
With all of these barriers facing him, Solomon must find the strength — the same strength that brought him north, the same strength that gives him hope of
My sense and love of Miss Shoemaker is strangely mingled with that of my sense and love of Holy Cards. Miss Shoemaker seemed omniscient to me. She made so much of the year I spent with her, that little of it has gone from my memory. She had a Scottish accent and you could almost hear the bagpipes in her voice. She wore tweed skirts and knitted wool sweaters, crisp white blouses, and polished black leather Oxfords. Her short hair, iron grey, was worn in a series of little crimps. We were to be her last class before retirement and she was a legend in the school.
I wonder if Southern Company was the company singing the praises of the new EPA regulations. Southern Company through Mississippi Power’s new demonstration lignite coal plant in Kemper County, Mississippi will be voluntarily participating in the proposed EPA CO2 regulations and plays an pro-active roll in helping the EPA gain the numbers needed to implement the new regulations.
Not the heart.
Out of the old lie burning on the ground,
While our mind/brain often just react to situations, your heart can respond in ways that can turn stresses or obstacles into learning opportunities. However, that does not mean that you stop using your brain or are being emotional/irrational, instead it means that our brain is under the guidance of the wisdom of our heart.
This Saturday will be my little boy's 4th birthday party. It's hard to believe that Denver, who is my oldest will be 4 years old. Time is flying by and seems to be going by quicker every year. He starts Kindergarten next year and already can't wait to start school.
I hate to tell you guys, but real women come in all shapes, sizes, shades and some of us are pretty damn intelligent! You’re missing out!
Ghost and witches
Mark Ruffalo is always charming. Ben Affleck looked hot in that Jeremy Renner movie, as did Jeremy Renner.
my little hands off and I've got my first large project done! It's the Anna Shawl from a pattern on Ravelry. And I did it!! I even managed to follow the pattern! Ok there are a couple of mistakes, a single instead of a double crochet in one place and some missed chains but hey! it looks alright :-D
Dash extra ground black pepper if you prefer a strong pepper taste.
Here is the blog hop list just in case you get lost along the way:
That scared my turnout buddy and I into using the 4 board fence corral, up by the main house! Barbed wire and new spaces with adjoining herds of horses...nope..we chose security over grass.
Jack Holloway works alone, for reasons he doesn’t care to talk about. Hundreds of miles from ZaraCorp’s headquarters on planet, 178 light-years from the corporation’s headquarters on Earth, Jack is content as an independent contractor, prospecting and surveying at his own pace. As for his past, that’s not up for discussion.
I was not sure what I was going to do with crochet holly at that point, but inspiration usually strikes at some stage.
In case you've been living under a rock,
Back in the car and on the road to Lititz, we passed through lovely Amish country and even a sign that stated it was “Christ’s Home Office” with an arrow pointing toward a building. Nice to know exactly where that is.
Sure as death and taxes she’s in need of a man
I love baking cookies. The problem is....I love to eat them more! It works out good when someone orders a batch from me because then I only have a few extras I can munch on instead of the whole batch! These little gems are delicious and light. They are Rosemary Cookies. I baked these for a friend at school. You wouldn't think of putting rosemary in cookies but it's delicious. Did you know rosemary means "remembrance"? I have given rosemary plants as end of the year teacher gifts because of the symbolism that goes with the plant. When my dear friend Nan married a couple years ago she had me make 100 little cellophane bags with 2 cookies in each bag as her giveaway at the wedding reception. They turned out so cute...I attached a little card with a ribbon on each bag. The card had a graphic of a rosemary twig in the shape of a heart...I put their name and wedding date in the center. It really turned out very special! Look for a blog post soon about using savory herbs in sweet concoctions....I have several yummy delicacies I'd love to share!
That, my friends, is sexy. Forget about the long ball.
While some parents may believe that their child is not well and needs help, others may think they themselves need help. In addition to looking for a cure, these parents frequently ask, “What did we do wrong.” Chances are, probably nothing. After all, if a child is asking self-examination questions, a parent is likely to have done more right than wrong. While parental self-doubt is not be useful to anyone, asking questions is healthy. The following are some useful questions to start with: How can I keep communication lines open even though I am not familiar with gender issues or crossdressing? Where can I send my son or daughter for support and validation, particularly when I don’t know how to offer it right now? Which is more important, fulfilling social stereotypes and other’s expectations or giving my child an opportunity to develop a healthy, gender identity?
Off Line When the pegs don't hold the washing up
Poppy Stamps, Inc. Craft Dies: Ivy Trendils, Small Madison Window,
And from what we can tell from the science of networks, there are some clues as to what sort of ‘topology,’ or shape, of network produces the greatest benefits for either of these factors. As it turns out, there is justification for democracy in nature. For in fact, it is the so-called ‘distributed’ network which seems to generally maximize both robustness and creativity. A distributed network is one with many small hubs, one which is relatively decentralized. One particular type of decentralized network, often referred to as a ‘small-worlds’ or ‘self-similar’ network, one which indicates many fractal properties, such that it possesses relatively the same number of hubs at multiple levels of scale, seems to be particularly special in the natural world, and one of the most consistently productive of complexity and robustness. But why are complex networks so stable and robust?
xx Hugs Lizzy xx :)
behind the bagpipes, we can hear something else... something un-identifable... something quite incongruous.
one at 4pm Helps to control hunger and keeps my stomach
"Jesus!"
Despite being ridiculed by both the mainstream and alternative media alike for his ‘irrational’ postings on his blog, beleaguered former Secretary-General of the National Solidarity Party (NSP) Goh Meng Seng continues to show off his ‘intelligence’ online.
But our password’s ‘victory’ and we will fight
07-Crossroads
than the past, all sorrow, and my own will.
The whistled air of a simple tune
Here is a link to a few pictures on their blog so you can see for yourself.
£õk†årøgâr
It's time for another Getting Cricky Simply Sunday Challenge. I like participating in this challenge on Sunday mornings because it helps me get my creative mind working. Usually Sunday is a big crafting day for me as I try to get my assignments done for the week.
Below, I analyze a lecture I chose from the hundreds of public lectures he has given all over the world on the integration of Christian faith with other public, testable areas of knowledge. In this lecture, entitled “Is There Scientific Evidence for an Intelligent Designer?“, Dr. Bradley explains how the progress of science has made the idea of a Creator and Designer of the universe more acceptable than ever before. (It’s a little different from the one I posted earlier in the week, and now I have summarized it so people can discuss it without having to watch the lecture).
The LilyPad system
my beliefs..
6. I was wrong. Nothing kills an iPad rollout faster than forcing teachers to wait two weeks until the building app committee meets to approve teacher app requests. If I was in charge, each teacher would have just one personal iTunes account. The school would provide iTunes cards or redeem codes and, yes, teachers would then “own” the apps. Let ‘em have them, it’s gonna be okay. You can get more.
4 tsp orange juice
“Let as many servants as are under the yoke count their own masters worthy of all honour, that the name of God and his doctrine be not blasphemed. And they that have believing masters, let them not despise them, because they are brethren; but rather do them service, because they are faithful and beloved, partakers of the benefit. These things teach and exhort.” I Timothy 6:1- 2
why I loved it: What I call a "perfect story" The tragic romance, the betrayal, the twists and turns and surprises and heart tugging adventure all adds up to The Count of Monte Cristo. If Alexandre were alive, I'd congratulate him.
If you're visiting from Classroom Freebies' Manic Monday, welcome and thanks for stopping by! I hope you'll grab the freebie, leave a comment, and stick around awhile!
"Do we know each other?" I asked her.
Below are some animation and model drawings.
I've been a member of Sisters in Crime Australia since 1998--my goddess, that's 10 years now!--which has connected me with some great Australian crime fiction. I'm a fan of Kerry Greenwood, Lindy Cameron, Leigh Redhead, Caroline Morwood, and Paddy O'Reilly--though the latter wouldn't describe herself as a crime writer; she just puts crimes in her stories. Beyond the Sisterhood, I read Garry Disher and Shane Maloney and I recently nabbed a copy of The Broken Shore by Peter Temple to take on my overseas sabbatical and see what all the fuss is about. Adrian Hyland's debut novel, Diamond Dove is terrific. Anyone worried about the state of Australian crime fiction should read Scarlet Stiletto - The First Cut for reassurance.
In addition to walking, we tried to mix up our activity over the course of the week. The ship had a full fitness center. When we went on our last cruise in 2000, that ship may have had a place to exercise. I didn't check; I wan't in the habit of going to the gym back then. Now I try to make time for exercise, so on the first day of the cruise Tony and I took a tour of the center. It had all the things I was used to seeing at my regular gym-treadmills, elliptical machines, weight machines, and free weights. There were also classes you could sign up for, but they weren't free.
I decided to get a little more involved and maybe make my yard a bird sanctuary too. Here are a few photos of what I’m currently working on.
The most colorful nineteenth century family to occupy the Mansion was that of Populist Jim Hogg. The Hoggs moved in with dozens of pets and four children, the latter of which had a great fondness for sliding down the banister of the curved staircase in the hallway. When one of the boys fell off and almost broke his neck, the Governor responded by sticking nails at intervals in the banister.
I'm still really liking my job, but I still have one last hurdle ahead of me: I will eventually have to give a tour of the foundation's facilities in French. There is no official tour script and everyone (from the director down to my colleague that works even less than I do) has their own style and touches on different things, so I'm really on my own coming up with what to say for an hour and fifteen minutes. In French. Heh. I still have a few weeks to prepare but I've been studiously scribbling out notes and typing them out in my free time because it's one thing to have an idea of what I want to say, but I desperately have to practice it in French. Very soon you'll find me talking to myself in my living room, recalling my theatre days memorizing lines.
and brings new things
Pulai MP Datuk Nur Jazlan Mohamed said that when Tun Dr Mahathir Mohamad asked his father, Tan Sri Mohamed Rahmat, to organise a similar gathering before the 1989 elections, the then information minister could only muster a crowd of about 40,000.
Still sometimes confused but making gains every few days.
Growing up, my twin sister and I did things a bit...differently. Christmas was a magical time of year to shake the other twins present until you heard something break, seperate gifts into piles, compare who got more, and snitch relentlessly in the hopes her present would become your present. Ah, memories. I'd to share with you now two stories that prove two things: 1) we were certifiably insane from a young age, and 2) I'm a goddamn moron.
I wonder if TLC would want to pick up our show for a season??
Organic. Fluid. I mull it over in my mind, making a few preliminary sketches, then I allow the process to unfold or emerge as I am creating. I'm never quite sure what the direction the work is going to take when I start. (Psychedelic Heart).
The intervention could amount to a breach of party rules, and will trigger calls for Labour leader Mr Miliband to discipline the business mogul, who served as enterprise tsar under Gordon Brown.
Here, though, is the practical application of all this. I think Blizzard is now or will soon be faced with WoW’s greatest challenge, a restructuring to four tiers, one more than they currently have. As the game playing populace ages, WoW has to adapt to the facts presented by the recent study (that I’m sure you’ve all seen) that can be summed up slightly inaccurately like this: about 50% of game time is by players under 18, but about 80% of money spent is players over 24.
Far from “winning hearts and minds,” the protracted occupation has resurrected the fortunes of the misogynist, ethnocentric, counter-revolutionary Taliban–responsible for 80% of civilian killings. The corrupt, U.S.-allied Karzai government, under which the oppression of women almost matches that of the Taliban, is hardly a credible alternative.
Now, figures and scales have never stopped me before, so after reading Gruntz for a couple of times I set up some scenery and dusted off my AT-43 figures for their very first combat action. Some scenery was not painted, and all figures were either unpainted (the tank) or painted by who-knows-who-in-what-slave-factory. It was a beautiful sight nevertheless. So hear kids. Badly painted figures are always a million times better than unpainted figures on the table. Learn that Warhammer crowd.
1. You are not mad, bad or dangerous – having a mental health condition does not mean you are a fundamentally flawed individual who is a risk to others. The majority of mental health conditions actually mean you are at greater risk of doing yourself harm than other people. You only have to look at examples such as Anders Behring Breivik – the Norwegian Mass Murderer to see that sane people are responsible for the most heinous of crimes, some may claim he was insane but that is clearly not the case, and even if it was insanity is different from having a treatable mental illness. Yes, there are cases of people with mental illness hurting or killing people, but often issues with poor care and treatment of the individual are at fault and even though these cases hit the headlines big-time they are no more frequent than the number of attacks carried out by the general population!
I took a wander to the shop after, as it was near the doctors and pharmacy. I wish I hadn’t! I had one of my worst dizzy spells ever, the floor looked like it was moving underneath me. I knew it wasn’t, but it still seemed to be moving. My legs went to jelly,I would have fell if it wasn’t for the trolly I had chosen to use to help me get round the shop! The dizziness made me feel really sick. I ended up slouching on the trolley until I felt well enough to move again. Then I got a taxi home, both my girls came to look after me till I felt okay on my own again.
So we prefer to ignore our faces and pretend they don’t really exist. Here they are, on view to absolutely everyone, except us.
standing still in the mist
And then I ate an apple.
It’s important, however, that we recognize that our requests
17The flesh is gone from my bones, and they give me no rest; there is no end to my pains.
Day 5-Cape Town, South Africa
Why did this trigger a meandering? Simple… it reminded me that my family is settling into a new faith community, yet I struggle with being content there and cannot fathom why. Or atleast until today in service I could not fathom why.
The KI design team has more inspiration for you using the April Key Ingredients kit and the theme "Tag You're It", but we're also challenging our subscribers to play along and be entered to win a free stamp set of your choice. Here are all the details you need to know for playing along:
No price has been announced yet, But Im thinking my next purchase is an I-pad.
"She's got this condition. Hang on." He put his hand inside his pocket and pulled out a piece of paper. He unfolded it on the table and read from it.
8 medjool dates
At seven years old, her taste in clothes
I know I shouldn't be projecting my wants on her. Not that they seem to bother her, she just keeps powering on, growing up faster than I can keep track of.
Because writing style is revealing.
Oh, well, it's nice now to just be able to carve out moments to create what I feel like creating. Like this little piece I made today just because I felt like making something in yellow and brown.
01/03/2012 BUY 0.01 usdcnh 6.31580
(920) 869-4239
In 1885, the Association of Breeders of Thouroughbred Holstein Cattle and the Dutch Friesian Association of America merged to form the Holstein-Friesian Association of America: ”The 284 dairymen who signed the founding charter of the organization wanted to preserve and disseminate useful information and facts about the Holstein pedigree. They strove to identify desirable qualities and distinguishing characteristics of the best of the Holstein breed, and to promote and communicate these to other dairymen to help increase their business success.”
My number. Thanks. Bye. Hi This is George. Again, I’m across the street and I’ll wait for you to call me back. With your
December 3, 2010 Clip No. 2712
I’m watching TV and am astonished to see that the men in Cialis and Viagra commercials are getting younger and younger. At first it showed white haired older gentlemen in their 70′s seductively grinning at their mature mates or dates, she seemingly happy because he took Viagra or Cialis. ( pills for erectile dysfunction).
What's even more embarrassing from the standpoint of journalism with a semblance of ethics or impartiality are the supposed 'sources' for the story:
A few weeks ago, Annie Flanagan of St James Cheese in New Orleans had a pretty good idea for a fundraiser – get some local breweries to donate some of their beers, which would be paired with several courses of cheese donated by St. James, sell tickets and donate one hundred percent of the proceeds to charity. And you know what, it was a huge success! All the money raised from the sold out evening was donated to New Incentives, an organization raising money to help young orphans and vulnerable children. With their partner COPE (Care of Nigeria’s Poor), the money raised that night will allow 92 children to be enrolled and continue to attend school, have regular visits to the doctor, eat a nourishing diet, get their birth certificates and receive vocational training. As always the folks at St. James Cheese were incredible and passionate with everything they did and everyone attending the event was awesome. For more information or to help out, check out www.newincentives.org.
The downside of the play is that is a tad bit sexist because it is judgmental towards the aristocratic women and not the great pretender Horner who seems to have a vicious appetite for fornication. This attitude also reflects on how badly women were treated then particularly accentuated by Pinchwife’s cruel treatment of his wife. Wycherley, however, does show Pinchwife in a ludicrous light perhaps to manifest that husbands who restrict their better halves and treat them so will deserve to be cheated and ‘cuckolded.’
How long is your average bike ride? Are you satisfied with your current distance or would you like to be able to ride a lot farther? My average bike ride is a metric century (60 miles) and I don’t think it is any big deal. However, I’ve met a lot of cyclists who think a 20 mile bike ride is major accomplishment.
how you enlarge pics with the new blogger. I don't find it too user-friendly
The Postman (Il Postino) directed by Michael Radford
(WARNING! May contain Spoilers!!!)
She spent ages making a triangular tower out of little paper cups tonight, each containing a little craft pom-pom. All very meticulously done, with a great deal of focus.
But that's just because I haven't told them the truth.
When it turns out the magic shop already had the weapon of a god--Olaf's Hammer--before Buffy's big fight with Glory in Buffy the Vampire Slayer.
So I’d like to say this was from some epic battle in Northrend, like me squaring off with Arthas, or even Anub’arak, and maybe having him unleash one of those swarms of locusts on me and they buzzed all over me and crushed my head down or some shit like that. But the truth of the matter is, it wasn’t anything that exciting.
I stepped on the scale this morning as usual...and I had lost I think .8 oz which is good! I was happy.. but then i went running, and I have gotten into this crazy habit of not eating anything before my run, and after I'm done I race home, strip down and hop on the scale without drinking any water ( see how obsessive i am ) and today with my second weigh in, I had lost lost .8 oz, which put me .2 oz away from exactly a 50 pound loss.....grrrrrrrrrr.
Happy Mother's Day to you!!!
Part III is an AP Quiz worth 20 points. It’s not online.
30’38 It’s All Good (Interlude)
According to the American Wind Energy Association (AWEA), only 700 MW (megawatts) were added to the nation’s electricity grid in the second quarter of 2010 and wind power installation to date this year has dropped by 57% and 71% from 2008 and 2009 levels.
62,000: Number Of Heavy And Civil Engineering Construction Jobs Lost Since The Stimulus Was Passed. (Bureau of Labor Statistics, Accessed 4/10/12)
He doesn’t even let hatred for his oppressors, in the final moments of his life on earth, cloud his vision of who he is and why he has come here.
Next post will feature the main sights to see in Krakow, Poland – so stayed tuned!
13. Con Alma
Ah, the allure of solitude. But it is likely that, after a stretch of being alone, we will long for company. Even Montaigne found that, for reasons other than mere loneliness, retirement to a life of solitude was not all that it was cracked up to be:
As a writer, when you can create a new, exciting, fantasy world in which everything is possible, and yet make the story realistic and identifiable (is that a word?) you’ve done your job. When I read the first book I became obsessed with this world where suddenly, the possible existence of aliens didn’t seem so silly anymore. The story wasn’t just very well described, not just exciting and tense. It was also touching. I felt sorry for John, who couldn’t have a normal childhood, but instead had to live in uncertainty every day, with the imminent thought of an almost inevitable very soon death.
MELBOURNE
Having faith in God requires us to be patient. “Patience” here means ‘to wait in continuous expectation’ . For example, have you ever called for a cab and told the service person that you needed a cab at ___am? What do you do then? You prepare and then wait for the cab to show up. right? It’s the same thing with faith. When we pray to God, we must believe that He will come through, but we must also have patience knowing fully that He will come through. So what do we do? We sit and patiently wait (i.e. continually looking for the things we are believing for, with expectation)
Here's the stencil: (just right click and save)
Our next stop was at a huge strangler fig. Huge. And strangly. When other trees are wee behbehs and just shooting their little sapling stems out of the ground, a monkey or a sloth might stroll along, happily munching on a fig and then do a little poo on the brand new tree. As the tree grows, the figs grows around it, and when the tree finally gets tall enough, the strangler fig grows down and twists its strangly roots all around it, killing the tree and standing in its place. They’re pretty beautiful and incredible trees (the English lady kept saying “Oooo, it’s very Middle Earth, isn’t it?” and the Frenchies kept muttering “Non, non, tis more, owyousay, Avatar” and our Costa Rican guide had no idea what anyone was talking about, proclaiming that he “hated movies and books and only read about botany”) – but that’s a bit mean, don’t you think? Such is life, I guess…
I'm so sorry.
they quite close, been in love with each other in a closet…only some of their friend knew bout it..everything is same till brother of one the girl back home..its not really brother…i guess..someone close to her family..relative…n he fall in love with her relative friend..then, actually, there are some event o situation that lead to a married for one of them..this, u should watch it by ur own..
- She has been told to write "favourable" reviews when the publication is keen to score an exclusive interview with a famous author. Bad review, no interview, ever!
For those who may not know, GOREZONE was the sister publication to FANGORIA, launched in 1988 by Fango publisher Norman Jacobs as a means to block any upstarts who might be looking to cut into FANGORIA's dollars. GOREZONE was essential meant to cut Fango's competition off at the curb and was effective at doing so, with Fango wannbes like Slaughterhouse never establishing an audience. But although GOREZONE was hatched with mercenary intentions, Fango head honcho Tony Timpone made sure the magazine was something special in its own right.
But each of us must write out of what and who and where we are. So, my punto dulce has been colonized by blundering settlers who look to a motherland I cannot recognize, nor give allegiance to.
This is my apple peeler, corer, slicer. I don’t know how to tell you how much I love this thing. Many, many thanks to Aunt Jane for spending so much time working on it today.
a growing wisdom and joy
And what do you know.
My hand rests on the olive of your shoulder,
1 fertilizes
The day started along canal towpath but I was soon climbing above Walkerwood Reservoir. My initial plan had been to hit the Woodhead Valley first before heading back to the bridleway for a lumpy route to Greenfield.
Jacket: H&M
it was Lo who told me about dog nutrition, and that all dog foods are not the same. i did not believe her.
There was a bitter silence between Julian and myself for the next few minutes. I could clearly see his nuisance flushed across his exhausted tanned face; the same face that once harbored a glow-it clearly made other white men envious. And his complementing hazel bedroom eyes didn’t help his situation none either.
Below is one video of some of the flash flooding that swept through the city of Toowoomba. They experienced and 8 metre wall of water, it's being called an inland tsunami. Many have lost their lives, many of them children and many more are missing and once the flood waters have receded, sadly more of these missing people will be found.
Foreign Bodies by Cynthia Ozick
So, Gurtash, I um…yeah, I’m sorry about your folks, but it’s good to hear you want to be a brave warrior of the Horde like your dad. Lucky for you we do have some really good trainers here in Orgrimmar, so make sure you listen to them once you’re a little older and you get to go down to the Valley of Trials. And make sure you eat lots of meat to build your strength. I know a lot of grownups are going to try pushing the vegetables on you, and they’re fine if you can choke them down, I guess, but trust me on this, you’re going to want a lot of protein for muscle. Pork, steak, bacon – dude, you cannot possibly get enough bacon – tastes great and great FOR you! Take it from your Warchief.
After church today she made a little box that had some straw, a piece of fabric, a small plastic pacifier, and a small plastic dog. The point of making the box was for her to use it to understand and tell the Christmas story-- that Jesus was God's gift to people and he came as a baby. He was born in a barn with animals and as Cate said, "wrapped up like a burrito" because the hay was itchy and he needed to stay warm.
When I am on a road trip, I allocate time for hiking and exploring. Sometimes I bring my bike.
GlassesUSA prides themselves on getting your glasses to you as quickly as possible.
And here comes an extra- we have LOTS of leftover freshly-ground horseradish from Passover (was that just a few weeks ago? seems like longer).
I found out it probably really wasn't my back that was the problem. Even though I do have two bulging disc. The Doctor believed it was a nerve inside my hip joint. Good thing the pain went away by itself or I would have been hospitalized and had to endure shots.
Both models feature a manual six-speed gearbox as standard with the seven-speed double-clutch transmission (PDK) available as an option. Both sports cars achieve their best fuel consumption and acceleration performance with the PDK.
If capitalism is a global system, then the response to it must be global as well. Regardless of familiarity or agreement with a “world systems” analysis, the global nature of capitalism can not be missed — manufacturing is continually moved to new locations with ever cheaper labor costs; raw materials and resources are traded around the globe on a massive scale; and capital moves to all corners of the Earth at a click of a computer button in search of new investment or for pure speculation.
She pulled out this mornings newspaper from the letterbox and took it into the kitchen. She opened it up and the headline read, “Man hangs self from bridge”. Reduced to tears when she realized it was James.Must have got the idea from the paper he read the other day,she thought to herself.
Much like my character Sam Mitchell, a lot of these women go through these challenges alone. It's enough pressure to make some want to go a little mad sometimes. But they persevere.
-1 lb. rotini, cooked and drained
I woke up Saturday morning and asked Tammy if she wanted to go back and do it again. For a brief moment she looked like she was all-in but then the rush of so many things she needed to do brought her back to her senses.
A soldier is brave and a terrorist is a coward. A soldier is protecting and preventing violence and a terrorist is inflicting pain and suffering. The Bhagavad Gita is the scripture of bravery in both realms of physical and metaphysical.
What I'll find
Many Thai women believe deeply in astrology as a guide for the implementation of projects.
After a brief stop to pick up a couple of lunch necessities, we headed home to share a meal, with two tired and hungry little boys singing a wordless duet about their troubles in the middle of the van. As I was flinging plates and food towards each child, the phone rang, with a call that, while it was not unexpected, was no less sad. My Aunt, of whom I wrote in a previous post, had passed away while our branch of the family tree was on the soccer field. I stumblingly asked my cousin if there was anything he and my uncle needed, kicked myself mentally for stumbling, and told him I love him. If you have the time and the inclination, please pray for him and my uncle.
I need more rice bags and maybe a more stable bag to hold them in. I got the ‘saddlebag’ effect today with only 4. Further, I need more weight in the bag, period… I didn’t feel like it was enough today.
Without taking her eyes off of his she removed her robe and let it slip to the ground. She slowly, mechanically unbuttoned her pajama top and dropped that to the ground also.
I personally feel the second part of that question is the easier to answer: if you’ve got your message down, a good editor will make your words the best they can be.
I made Rx svg, but it can be easily found many places on the web.
Place portobellos in a lightly greased glass baking dish. Stuff with farro risotto, then sprinkle with parmesan cheese. Bake in the oven until completely heated through and parmesan has lightly browned, approximately 15 minutes.
#2. Hawaii. $43,017. $115K total but we’re focusing on the here, now and the future. They’ve got 9 offices turning in. Is it a coincidence that the states with the most offices had the most growth and production? No coincidence. No mistake. Don’t make it one of yours.
This is a high calibre web site that at a glance gives you the level of difficulty on the trail to the waterfall(s), route distance, and estimated time to hike. Of course you also get a map, and photos of the waterfalls.
Passion is geared toward college students, and you’ve said Passion City Church will have the same DNA. Do you expect your parishioners to be largely young adults?
We, the Prison Books Collective of Chapel Hill, write to you in a time of crisis.
Anyway, it all got me to thinking that while evolution is completely ridiculous maybe we need to rename Intelligent Design so that kids could understand it better. Maybe it should be called Pretty Intelligent Design or B+ Design. That would be a lot easier to understand and it would get my son to stop asking questions.
3 of them were able to get projects in, even with such short notice of making the team. So will will already be able to see their designs.
Thesis! To even utter the dreaded name may send shivers down the spine of any graduating pupil. What are the benefits (and god-forbid, disadvantages) of having one year for your undergraduate dissertation… this post would also determine whether having a thesis partner is good (or bad) for one’s holistic health.
— Linda Rapka (words + photo)
To prepare the salsa: Rinse and dry the chile veins. Preheat a comal or skillet and cook until toasted, but not burned. Roast the garlic too, onion, and tomatoes in the same pan until they turn dark. Allow to cool. In a molcajete or food processor, grind the chile veins with the salt and garlic, regrinding it all well. Add the onion and continue grinding. Add the tomatoes and grind until the sauce thickens,then add the water and re-season.
I hopefully will be back later on with a few bits to show you - have been playing with my new stash :)
After trying the Xpro Chrome I was very excited about trying other cross processed film but I'm still not convinced with this film, its very green. However, the colour shift with sunsets is impressive and the distortions are much stronger in comparison to the Xpro Chrome... I think it may be a grower.
Thus, as early as now, we are already seeing politicians of all colors sashaying towards the political platform of UNA for political expediency.
I have family photos of Christmas and Easter and they do not bring back
I tried to make myself sound convincing but I knew I wasn’t fooling her, heck I wasn’t fooling me anymore. Jamie had been there for me the first time Jack had hit me, I was so confused, frightened and hurt. She had comforted me, told me to get help before it was too late for me, for him. She had been understanding and did not judge us, well she did not judge me, she hasn’t had a real conversation with him since the first time he hit me; partly because I told her not to say anything to him. He couldn’t know that she knew and I knew if she spoke with him she’d say something. It was her character; she couldn’t be in the same room with him without cussing him out.
“Then who was the first one to come from Space?” he asked.
Ah well that gets a bit complicated, you see, you have to understand that many people on that list are labour, conservative and Lib politicians, high ranking police and local councillors; they are not the immediate enemy nor the governments concern, and it is only by the grace of god that many others of their ilk have not joined this growing prestigious list if only by being fleet of foot or by their unscrupulous colleagues closing ranks.
Inside the terminal are tons of vendors with tons of wonderful food items. Ruth and LaDonna chose a Jewish deli for food while Polly went for Mediterranean. All was excellent. We walked around a bit, then hopped back on for a tour of the rest of the city. We ended the tour back at the Visitor Center and went through Independence Hall. The Liberty Bell was right next door, but we decided to forego the long line and just look at it through the glass.
This evening, I was talking with a girl who is really involved in small groups at church. She also works full time and goes to school. "How do you accomplish all these things and still do life?" I asked her?
I knew these bowls would be perfect for the job!
Thought it would be a good time to check in on this year's Northwest Passage conditions. As of this past weekend, the passage is open and boats are now moving through from both east and west.
It is "typically American" to over-emote.
emotions arising from deep devotion.
Brazilian African-American museum
It’s in this way that The Loop incorporates the users, and promotes them to a like-position of co-developers.
These are the examples of interests I've been given:-
If you loved me, if you really love me
Chris Snowdon too.
10. Tortoise - Eros
yet, we budget over nearly 1.2
Viper Moon is Lee Roland‘s debut novel and it shows. There are some great elements to the novel but there are also many aspects to the world and story that seemed a bit tired.
Its chief purpose is to deepen one’s experience until the presence of the divine is actually real. Rather than warring against each other, these two aspects of the self are allies in the battle against a common enemy: illusion. So the muddle is ours, not Socrates’. By definition an experiment that seeks to find the true self by asking 20 questions is secretly on the side of rationality, as all data collection is. The results are skewed in advance. After all, a subject who said “This is a stupid experiment. I’m outta here” would be just as true to the self as someone who sat still and obediently took the test — maybe he would be even more true. But all such statements are secondary. The true self means little until it jumps off the page of a philosophy textbook and becomes a vocation, a vision and the ultimate goal of life.
Mayer RE, Aldrich TE, Earely CE. Effects of noise and electromagnetic fields on reproductive outcomes. Environ Health Perspect 1989; 81: 193-200.
4. Transfer everything into a saucepan. Add the breadcrumbs and stock, then purée. Check the seasoning and serve.
RGB Networks
Disc 3A (October 3rd 1995) Yoyogi Olympic Pool, Tokyo, Japan
This volume of the omnibus has two novels and a collection of short stories involving Jeeves. The first of these is called The Mating Season and is a laugh riot involving a medley of adorable lovers, the bumbling Bertie, horrible aunts and of course Jeeves who stands tall amid the chaos. PG Wodehouse does not write suspense so I would not be spoiling anything if I say that in the end, Jeeves brings order to a chaos ridden world of multiple lovers confused about who they love and Bertie trying to escape from the attentions of the extremely irritating Madeline Bassett.
Precisely how
Hm. Suffice to say, this is a temporary name until I can figure out a better one. Any better ideas welcome!
Gasoline prices were not half what they are now, though. So, there is that to consider. The slightly longer distance. The more than slightly higher cost of fuel. Still, it would be work. Somewhat steady, hopefully not too badly paying summer work. So, I was game.
It went from warm to hot to too hot. I've learned to appreciate the a/c and I seek out the shade. There's something wrong in the world of Dot.Com!
STEVEN: Early on, I was definitely trying for that each chapter had a small arc. Some are more stand alone than others, like the chapter with the feral dog pack, and the sections dealing with the thief. The last third of the novel, though, is more continuous.
· Matt Rodriguez, agent, AM Only
It’s your last hour on Earth. What are you going to do? Ryley says that West & Run’s goal is to “continue to push ourselves and create success with what we have.”
Have a lovely Labor Day weekend, dears! Or, as I like to put it; Labor Day: the day that everyone takes off work. Because America makes sense like that.
You see…
I expect Nicoletta will be the next in a long line growers to make the most of their land wherever it may be (even if we skipped a couple generations)!
In real life, conclusions are not always needed in order to go on. You may come to the point where you find you are in a relationship in which the other feels conversely about something you care deeply about. Before you reject the person and their ideas, here are some viable questions. Did you always feel as passionate as you do at present? What caused you to arrive at the opinion or passion you are at now? Might the trajectory of the other individuals path still be undefined based on the process they have been through so far? What will it hurt to allow a few more levels of follow through? Conclusions are made after all, by conclusive evidence from actions that prove belief.
I have my first follower, Thank you Tracey -beyond exciting! It will be good to have the support.
Wednesday – Soup and grilled cheese
How important does the LORD view this Day of Atonement? (“Do not work on that day, because it is the Day of Atonement, when atonement is made for you before the LORD your God. Anyone who does not deny himself on that day must be cut off from his people. I will destroy from among his people anyone who does any work on that day. You shall do no work at all. This is to be a lasting ordinance for the generations to come, wherever you live. It is a sabbath of rest for you, and you must deny yourselves. (Leviticus 23:28-32 NIV))
If I wanted a little more substance,( and more points) I could have added some creamy feta cheese on top of the mushrooms before cooking, or topped it with salsa ( which is 0 points) when it was done.
In the kind of future we can realistically expect, in other words, homescale windpower will almost certainly be a viable technology, while giant wind turbines of the modern sort almost certainly won’t. Now of course it’s a safe bet that the windpower industry as it now exists will keep on building, servicing, and promoting giant wind turbines as long as it’s possible to do so, so the small chance that the giant turbines might actually be viable is covered. What isn’t covered yet is the very large chance that small wind turbines of the sort that can be built and maintained in a basement workshop could provide a real benefit during the difficult decades ahead of us.
a response.
The flavor of the yogurt was pleasant, almost reminded me of an unripe honeydew.
I was having trouble getting started with my poem this week. I was playing with a few ideas that were not quite panning out. Then, I was assigned a subject/inspired by my friend Tim Donner. The conversation went a little like this:
"For sixty days, we will give up wearing any makeup, removing any body hair, altering our hair from its natural state (dying, curling, straightening), wearing uncomfortable feminine clothing (high heels, tight skirts), wearing jewelry (with the exception of wedding bands), painting our nails, using anti-wrinkle or anti-acne lotions, wearing deodorant, or styling our hair for reasons other than function."
Not like I haven't had practice in assembly-line and production sewing. My earliest sewing memories are of helping my mother make doll clothes. No, not for my dolls. She sewed for Peggy-Ann and Totsy, two big producers of doll clothes. She'd get a big box delivered to her, which would have the cut out pieces for anywhere from 20 to 50 dozen doll outfits. There'd be a sample, and whatever trims she'd need to make them--laces, ribbons, rickrack, etc. She had an industrial machine that sewed forward, very fast. No backwards. A ruffler that screwed on, one of those complicated looking gizmos that would ruffle the bottom layer and sew it to the top at the same time. She'd sew the pieces one after the other in huge long chains, and my job was to snip the chains apart to get them ready for the next step.
I love the idea of all those mobile-truck ideas and they worked! So, from time to time, I scream at Wifesy when the writing’s just not going all that well – “LET’S DO THE BIG GAY VET VAN.” I think it’s brilliant. We could park the thing in West Hollywood and do grooming and pet checks with Wifesy doing all the doctoring. Out of the front of the van, I’d sell tacos – well – because why not? We’d play nothing, but Abba and Scissor Sisters out of surround sound speakers framing the window. When my little Gayby grows up, I’d leave him or her the van. He or she can do with it what they will. But, I hope he’ll sell something out of it, something that is his own. Even if he’s straight and he turns it into, “Manly’s Mobile Man Show” and it’s like a peep show with lots of t and a and stripper poles and jello-shots. Of course, I’ll gasp from the grave in horror, but I’ll also smile, ‘cause Gayby did something for himself. He paved his own way. He made something. It worked.
The color is a subtle yet a welcome update to the space. Now, I feel like I can play even more with colorful toys and accents since the walls are much more muted and make for a nice backdrop to the fun that comes with a playroom.
His friends ran away
Fig
The brewery is just that, a production brewery... you can take a tour and do a tasting, that sort of thing. There a few surprises on the tour that make it worth your time even if you've been on a thousand other brewery tours before. The tasting room/gift shop is the final stop, this is where you can pick up T-shirts, beer soap and glassware. The nice thing about Delaware is that you can buy beer directly from the brewery, and there's no sales tax (at all) so this will be the cheapest place to stock up. The only downside is that the state doesn't allow single 12oz bottles to be sold individually so if you want World Wide Stout or 120 Minute you'll have to commit to a 4pack, which isn't cheap... but totally worth it. Also worth noting, there's a ton of traffic through the tasting room so seasonal stuff doesn't last long. Aprihop was gone in about a week, so if arrive just past the release of a seasonal beer you might not be able to find it at the brewery.
8:30 am – 4 pm Registration, Book Exhibit open until 4 pm.
A few months ago I spent a weekend with a foreign TV journalist and his cameraman.
I’ve got lot’s of errands to run tomorrow and Wednesday and the car is going to the garage to have a wheel bearing replaced so I’m trying to squeeze all the housework in today….hmph…I’d much rather be crafting. Anyhoo, enough waffle I was going to try and keep this post to the point.
Entry #59
So what I actually do, is look towards his two laughing mates, themselves the same sort of age and reasonable build, and quickly close the door. I hold the door shut, pushing myself up against it, trying to remember how to lock it without the key, because all of a sudden, out of nowhere, I felt incredibly vulnerable. There was nobody else outside to help me- none of the usual taxi drivers, who have been so supportive before, no neighbours, no other pub-goers.. and nobody else inside.
Asking people questions with psychopathically wide eyes, a perpetually nodding head, in a voice that makes them wonder if I’ve had a testicle removed and my jaw broken does not help get things done.
We weren't out long...
So... that means I chose 5 winners.
“The head of police was my father’s friend,” my acquaintance continued. “Long before those riots, he often warned my Dad not to send us children to school on certain days, or not to go to a particular part of town. He was our friend, you see, but even he was part of it. He was trying to frighten us, to make us leave.”
It really is a good honest beer at a tasty price. My college roommate and I used to kick back and have a few of these when we wanted a change up from Milwaukee's Best Light ("The Beast"). I've also been known to buy 1 every once and awhile when out with friends at the bar. I don't think it has the best taste when it comes to American Lagers, but for the price it's worth it.
“But whenever anyone turns to the Lord, the veil is taken away.
Daughter: I need a poo
Note: I would also like to say that I tried to pick a different body part, but there is a surprisingly small amount of parts of our bodies that could be an asset if we had more of….The breast was literally the only one I could come up with…..
The sad thing is that it devastated a good portion of that side. I went home, got my gear and headed to the place. I found this compo interesting as the little plane on the upper left hand corner was just coming out from the columns of smoke and it emerged out giving e the opportunity to include it in the scene.
Thanks for reading and have a great week! See you again soon!
so while I wait I will amuse you with a few random things. Join us! I've always wanted to do this.
So there we go. Look, listen, learn and share, and keep on sharing. Life's too short to be selfish, life is for living with other people around us, to make the world a better place for all. Have a great day, keep well...
The saddest thing is, as I conclude this reflection on why I am no longer a supporter of Amanda Palmer, is that Amanda is blatantly Bipolar. As in, Bipolar I with possibly rapid cycling and mixed episodes. She obviously needs support and help, but of course, no one in her circle of praise will make her seek it out. In reading this recent blog, I am struck by how painfully similar it is to the highs and lows documented by Marya Hornbacher in Madness: A Bipolar Life (amazing memoir, by the way, and as unapologetically honest as her previous book, Wasted). But even if she is stark-raving manic and delusional, I can’t excuse her persistent narcissism and refusal to own her actions, contrary to her insistence that she does, indeed, take responsibility. I look at my punk manifesto t-shirt from the long-lost Dolls days, and realize that Amanda is becoming exactly what the shirt condemns.
4 tbsp dark rum
Continue cooking the sauce, stirring occasionally, for 10-15 minutes.
(Chad is my boss, CEO, and father of 3)
I also wanted to include the surroundings from the story: dense woods, a strawberry patch, big white daisies and a path to grandma's house.
When I got up last night to get ready to go to work, there was a dozen red roses in a vase on the Kitchen counter and a card from Joe.....
Bring the double cream to a boil in a sauce pan, over medium heat.
Once you've got your sheets ready, adhere them to the tile with Mod Podge and continue coating until you've got them sealed to your liking.
"Kirin Emblem. 43 per cent alcohol.
small ones that is....
I didn't even want this set until I saw this cutie.
The third quarter was a whole different ball game. The sixers were hitting all of there shots, and there defense was playing awesome and stopping everything, and they were out rebounding the bulls which help out a lot. The sixers went on a huge run and almost scored 40 points in the one quarter. The game was then getting out of hand.
Simple, comfortable but an outfit with a bit of PUNCH!
have also already had some success in research-scouting, and i can't help but feel like the modern-day equivalent of the egyptian pharaohs sending envoys to "punt" (their name for ethiopia) for myrrh, or the ptolemies scoping out the interior to buy elephants for their armies. this whole process of arriving at a place as a foreigner and begging people for trade - for me it's information and personal histories and archives, but i can't help but feel sucked into the ancientness of ethiopia. of course every african nation has centuries of rich histories of change and development and trade and war, but ethiopia is unique in how much of it has been recorded in forms that still exist today, so we can really sketch out a rough image of what it has looked like for 5 thousand years. the ancient aksum empire was converted to Christianity in 400 AD by Syrian traders (oh how history has changed, no?) - there are churches 1000 years old carved totally into rock-faces, stelae and standing stones 2000 years old...
In the intensive care unit I met two pastors, both doing their best to console a frightened and exhausted family desperately concerned for their little boy.
John 6:55 "For My flesh is true food, and My blood is true drink.
I think Winstanley has a lot to offer us today in terms of urban planning and structuring our society in a way where those without high paid jobs or large disposable incomes can still work to feed themselves and become less dependent on big business and big government, a society where the poor are cared for.
So I am hereto unfriending Facebook and flipping it the bird effective the end of this week. I want to be able to pass on contact information to those that truly matter first.
Hope you enjoy looking through the photos & happy cooking. Bon appetite.
And I figured since we're vacationing the week of yours and you get a party.......
Have you ever met a stranger who reminded you of a loved one?
They have to take the abuse that they have caused our present state with their intruding history
The moon peeked out from behind a cloud and illuminated the ground.
For me, that special item was my favourite shirt. Made from a floaty white cotton fabric covered in large pink and yellow roses with tiny touches of cornflower blue, not to mention the small ruffle around the neckline and pintucks on the front! Well, seems I loved that shirt a bit too much and wore it beyond its use by date.
Or the bluest that I've ever seen
Thanks for ALL of you who shared last week (and there were MANY of you)!!!
QUESTION: What is your favorite inspirational (vs. instructional) book on writing?
General Irwin McDowell planned to march one column up to the Stone Bridge across Bull Run to make a feint, while sneaking a stronger column around his right flank across the Run further upstream at Sudley Spring Ford, shown in the photo above. Even if taken as much as a year later, the photo shows it was a place where you could wade through that water without bothering with the bridge.
Natalya feels bad for AJ, but AJ attacks Natalya, and is angry, she doesn’t answer to the 5 count, and the referee DQ’s her.
So, it’s coming together and I’m really happy with how it turned out! Best of all, the entire budget for the project was just the cost for the brackets which were around $2/each and we got 3 of them for a grand total of $6. But, I still need to find something to hold the mirror in place. Any recommendations?
I make it home before my parents and am able to escape the third degree, but before I can change out of my uniform, an incoming communication comes through on my tablet. The polite, robotic female voice notifies me. Communication from Summer Taylor, April 4th, 4:27 p.m. Recording has begun.
Let me tell you about Spero. He’s 29 years old. He’s a recent Iraqi and Afghanistan war veteran who grew up and lives in D.C. Pelecanos describes him as good-looking, in perfect physical condition, witty, and intelligent. He’s kind to poor kids in his neighborhood. He rides his bike all over the city. Enjoys food of all kinds, especially the joints that you have to be a local to know about. He is a lover of all sorts of music, and impresses others with his command of obscure musicians and bands. He’s a private investigator, working for himself, using only an iPhone and a Moleskine notebook. And the women love him. It took him about 5 minutes to pick up the hot paralegal in an attorney’s office. He knows how to fire several weapons, but can also kill a man with his bare hands. My admiration of this fictional character reached a peak when he takes his hot girlfriend to Busboys and Poets in D.C. (V Street location, of course) and buys her a book. What book does he buy her? “Lean on Pete.” A reference to an obscure book that I just finished raving about on this blog! How great is that?!? I’m quitting my job and buying a bike (already have the iPhone and Moleskine notebook). Anyone need any crimes solved?
Thoroughly refreshing myself during holidays is a source of energy. I had a WONDERFUL time with my friends. Thanks!!!
Nothing like sitting on the muddy lawn with a super warm hat and no socks and shoes on a warm Fall day eating fruit snacks and getting sick of Mom and her camera. Have you tried those Betty Crocker Halloween Fruit Snacks? They really stick to your teeth.
The NASSCOM software product study, what is it that we lack and how to help homegrown businesses go global was the focus for the research finding. We looked at the Silicon valley and other parts of the globe, exhibiting similar growth patterns in India could result into opening newer vistas into hugely untapped local markets.
"It's fine. I just want you to be honest."
Let the dead Past bury its dead!
Josh Thompson has been on the road with Brad Paisley all summer, on the H2O World Tour. He’s spent about 6 years in Nashville paying his dues. He’s says he’s put in his 10,000 hours! With struggling artists trying to make it, that’s a normal thing. Josh explains below.
1.Tomato : 2
Silver Brewsters Helles 4.0
AND THEN THE WINDSPREN TALKS AGAIN.
Hi Friend
have a lovely day...and lets hope it's dry...!
-Submitted by staff reporter E. Wenzel
That was when Yugoslavia was Yugoslavia, a non-aligned, socialist republic; proud of its multi-cultural, multi-ethnic composition. I really had no idea of the seething sectarian hatred under the surface. But I loved the old walled city of Dubrovnik — formerly the Venetian colony of Ragusa — and the ruggedly beautiful Croatian coast. And Mostar in Bosnia-Hercegovina was like stepping back into the middle ages and the Islamic past of the Balkans. It was exotic and atmospheric.
With short stories like this it is difficult because, as I know myself, stories that have got nowhere in one comp, have won another, with no further edits, so I don’t lose heart is what I’m saying! We had a team of 5 reading the many entries, all with guidelines and enough experience to really know what was good and what didn’t work as well and remember it is also relative to what else we have in.
JTTM subscribers can visit this page to view the report
From there, the list covers many of the usual suspects: Stone Mountain Park, The Coca-Cola Museum (yes, they are great marketers and the building is a tribute to their marketing, but really??), Underground Atlanta, and an Atlanta Braves baseball game. Given the list was for Georgia and not Atlanta, I had wished a few others made the list, like something in Savannah,
You might even think of a somewhat "heavier" version of a "light" lunch, such as this sliced avocado with Roasted Pepper Pico de Gallo. But, that's not what I mean either.
'Yes that's more than generous..'
Assault by Firearm
